~
c: \ignou
~ THE PEOPLE'S
IUNIVERSITY
Indira Gandhi
National Ooen University
National Centre of Disabiliy Studies
MCFT-003
Counselling and Family Therapy:
Basic Concepts and
Theoretical Perspectives
••
INTRODUCTION TO COUNSELLING AND
FAMILY THERAPY 1
/
"Education is a liberating force,and in our
age it is also a democratizing force,
cutting across the barriers of caste and
class, smoothing out inequalites imposed
by birth and other circumstances."
- Indira Gandhi
"fu~TTl1RCf Cfil ~~ ~ liCRf Cfi\Cft % 3TI?:
3:rrcrf ~ ~T[ if en % "ffi~?f qfr 'l1fcRT CfiT
3TI~ ~ % I \lP1 Cf~ 3p:f ~ ~ ~
~ ~ cmllcf fct Gll1d laTI Cfil ~?:~ ~
1l1~Cfil ~~~ ~%I"
- ~C!:~ 1Tim
/
~
~ignOU ~ THE PEOPLE'S
UNIVERSITY
Indira Gandhi National Open University
National Centre for Disability Studies
MCFT-003
Counselling and Family
Therapy: Basic Concepts
and Theoretical Perspectives
Block
1
INTRODUCTION TO COUNSELLING AND
FAMILY THERAPY
UNIT 1
Counselling: Meaning, Scope and Applications 7
UNIT 2
Family Therapy: Meaning, Scope and Applications 29
UNIT 3
Career Counselling 71
UNIT 4
Family Theories in Practice 87
/
EXPERT COMMITTEE
Prof. V.N. Rajasekharan Pillai (Chairperson)
Vice Chancellor
IGNOU, New Delhi
Prof. Reeta Sonawat
Dean & Head, Department of
Human Development, SNDT
Women's University, Mumbai
Prof. Shagufa Kapadia
Head, Department of Human
Development and Family Studies
The M.S. University of Baroda
Vadodara
Dr. Rajesh Sagar
Associate Professor,
Deptt. of Psychiatry, AIIMS &
Secretary, Central Mental Health
Authority of India, Delhi
Prof. Anisha Shah
Department of Mental Health and
Social Psychology, NIMHANS,
Bangalore
Prof. Minhotti Phukan
Head, Deptt. of HDFS
Assam Agricultural University
Assam
Dr. Jayanti Dutta
Associate Professor of HDCS,
Lady lrwin College, New Delhi
Prof. Vibha Joshi
Director, School of Education
IGNOU, New Delhi
Prof. Neerja Chadha
(Programme Coordinator)
Professor of Child Development
School of Continuing Education
IGNOU, New Delhi
Prof. Mathew Verghese
Head, Family Psychiatry Centre
NIMHANS, Bangalore
Prof. Manju Mehta
Department of Psychiatry
AIIMS, New Delhi
Prof. Rajni Dhingra
Head, Department of Human
Development
Jammu University, Jarnmu
Prof. Sudha Chikkara
Department of Human
Development and Family Studies
CCS HA U, Hisar
Mrs. Vandana Thapar
Deputy Director (Child
Development), NIPCCD
New Delhi
Ms. Reena Nath
Practising Family Therapist
New Delhi
Prof. C.R.K. Murthy
STRIDE
IGNOU, New Delhi
Prof. Girishwar Misra
Department of Psychology
University of Delhi, New Delhi
Prof. Ahalya Raghuram
Department of Mental Health
and Social Psychology,
NIMHANS, Bangalore
Prof. T.B. Singh
Head, Department of Clinical
Psychology, IHBAS, New Delhi
Prof. Aruna Broota
Department of Psychology
University of Delhi
New Delhi
Dr. Indu Kaura
Secretary, Indian Association for
Family Therapy, New Delhi
Dr. Rekha Sharma Sen
Associate Professor
(Child Development), SOCE
IGNOU, New Delhi
Mr. Sangmeshwar Rao
Producer, EMPC, IGNOU
New Delhi
Dr. Arniteshwar Ratra
(Convenor & Programme
Coordinator)
Research Officer, NCDS
IGNOU, New Delhi
Acknowledgment:
We acknowledge our thanks to Prof. Omprakash Mishra, Former PVC, IGNOU; Prof. C.G. Naidu, Former Director (l/c)
P&DD and Head, Nodal Unit; Dr. Hemlata, Former Director (Uc) NCDS; and Dr. Arun Banik, Director, NCDS, for facilitating
the development of the programme of study.
PROGRAMME COORDINATORS - M.Se. (CFT) / PGDCFT
Dr. Amiteshwar Ratra
Research Officer
NCDS, IGNOU, New Delhi
/
Prof. Neerja Chadha
Professor of Child Development
SOCE, IGNOU, New Delhi
COURSE COORDINATORS
Dr. Amiteshwar Ratra
Research Officer
NCDS, IGNOU, New Delhi
Prof. Neerja Chadha
Professor of Child Development
SOCE, IGNOU, New Delhi
COURSE WRITERS
Unit 3
Dr. K.S. Latha, Associate Professor in Psychiatric Social Work, Dept.
of Psychiatry, K.M.C. Hospital, Manipal University, Manipal.
Ms. Supama Kailash, Clinical Psychologist, New Delhi.
Units 1 & 2
Unit 4 Prof. Reeta Sonawat, Dean and Head, Department of Human
Development; SNDT Women's University, Mumbai.
Acknowledgement
Art work for Unit 2 has been provided by the author Dr. K.S. Latha, Associate Professor
in Psychiatric Social Work.Dept. of Psychiatry, K.M.C. Hospital, Manipal University, Manipal.
BLOCK EDITORS
Prof. Girishwar Misra
Department of Psychology
University of Delhi
New Delhi
Prof. Neerja Chadha
Professor of Child Development
SOCE, IGNOU, New Delhi
Dr. Amiteshwar Ratra
Research Officer
NCDS, IGNOU, New Delhi
March. 2011
© I,· /:"0 Gandhi National Or rn University, 2011
1St 978-81-266-5212-9
All ugnts reserved. No part of this work may be reproduced in any form, by mimeograph or
any other means, without permission in writing from the Indira Gandhi National Open University, New Delhi.
Further information on Indira Gandhi National Open University courses may be obtained
from the University's office at Maidan Garhi, New Delhi- 110 068 or the official website of
IGNOU at www.ignou.ac.in.
Printed and published on behalf of Indira Gandhi National Open University by Registrar,
MPDD.
..
Laser Composed by: Rajshree Computers, V-166A, Bhagwati Vihar, (Near Sector-2, Dwarka),
Uttarn Nagar, New Delhi-I 10059
Printed by: '.,;".'.,,~i~'",,, .~.• "i. \-12X. \la,,~,,1 !'tu-; l'Il-IIIlI'I".
I
MCFT-003 COUNSELLING AND FAMILY
THERAPY: BASIC CONCEPTS
AND THEORETICAL
PERSPECTIVES
"Counselling and Family Therapy: Basic Concepts and Theoretical Perspectives"
is the third Course of this programme of study. It comprises both theory
and supervised practicum components. The theory paper on this Course is
MCFT-003 and the Course on supervised practicum is MCFTL-003. You have
to complete and clear both these components separately. For theory paper
MCF'r-003, you will have' continuous evaluation through an assignment and a
term-end examination. For MCFTL-003 you have to work under the supervision
of the academic counsellor allotted from the study centre you are attached with .
. In the end as per the details given in the Supervised Practicum Manual, you
have to submit your file to the study centre for evaluation. We would like to
acknowledge the various authors, books, journals and web sites from which
matter related to this Course was researched though they have been duly
acknowledged in the relevant Units but might have inadvertently been missed.
Throughout this Course, patient, client, family, individual, and couple have been
used interchangeably.
MCFT-003 Course is designed to make learners aware of the basic concepts
related to counselling and family therapy and aquaint you with the various theories
on counselling and family therapy. This Course will introduce you to the different
schools of counselling and family therapy. It will provide you knowledge on
the modalities of counselling and family therapy.
MCFT-003 Course would help you to develop the understanding that is required
of counsellors and family therapists to have deeper knowledge about the basic
concepts and theoretical aspects of counselling and family therapy. The Course
consists of four theory Blocks.
THE BLOCKS
Block 1 is on "Introduction to Counselling and Family Therapy". This Block
introduces you to counselling and family therapy, their definitions, historical
development of fields as counselling and family therapy and different types of
approaches used in counselling and family therapy. The Block also emphasises
on career counselling, the need for career counselling, its features and various
factors that influence career decisions. Further, we will also study how family
theories are applied in day-to-day life. We will discuss crisis theory, empowerment
theory and intergenerational theory in detail. On studying this Block, you will
be able to define counselling, family therapy and career counselling and
understand the key concepts related to them.
Block 2 is titled "Schools of Counselling". The Block consists of four Units.
The Units explain different types of approaches to counselling, like psychodynamic
approaches, cognitive behavioural approaches, person-centred approaches,
group counselling, transactional analysis, existential approach to counselling. The
Block helps you to understand the different processes in psychodynamic
psychotherapy. The Block aquaints you with different types of cognitive
behavioural approaches like emotive techniques REBT, cognitive therapy (CT)
/
li
J
by Aaron Beck, and Donald Meichenbaun's cognitive behaviour modification
(CBM). After studying this Block you will be able to demonstrate the specific
procedures and techniques that facilitate constructive client change in personcentered counselling. This Block also explains the group counselling approaches
and other counselling approaches like transactional analysis, existential approach
to counselling.
Block 3 is on "Schools of Family Therapy". The Block will acquaint you with
the various types of approaches used in family therapy, systemic family therapy;
solution focussed family therapy, strategic family therapy, structural family therapy,
cognitive behavioural family therapy and integrated eclectic approach. The Block
discusses the basic concepts, key features and historical development of these
various types of family therapies. The Block further discusses the therapist's
role in systemic couple and family therapy. After going through this Block you
will be able to understand various approaches to family therapy and elaborate
on the therapeutic proc~sses and techniques of family therapy.
Block 4 is titled "Modalities of Counselling and Family Therapy". The Block
orients towards various modalities of counselling and family therapy like family
interviewing, crisis intervention, supportive counselling, psychoeducation and
social skills therapy. The Block provides detailed knowledge on family
interviewing, therapeutic interview, methods of interviewing and special issues
in conducting family therapy sessions. It will make you aware about crisis, their
development and management and various intervention strategies for families and
communities in crisis. The Block will help you in understanding the concept
of psychoeducation and its importance. Finally, the Block will aquaint you with
the know ledge of social skills therapy.
Manual for Supervised Practicum MCFTL-003
MCFT-003 is the practical course of Counselling and Family Therapy: Basic
Concepts and Theoretical Perspectives. This Block will provide you the
framework for hands on experience. The details regarding the same are provided
in the Manual. The Practical Manual provides you step wise directions for doing
the practical activities and recording observations.
Audio-Video Programmes
Various audio and video programmes have been prepared on the different aspects
of counselling and family therapy. These would be available at your Study Centre.
It is advisable to keep in touch with the coordinator of your study centre so
as to know about new audio and video programmes. You must go through
these audio and video programmes.
HOW WILL THIS COURSE HELP YOU?
The Course will introduce you to the concepts of counselling and family therapy,
and will help you to understand the modalities of counselling and family therapy.
You will be able to demonstrate various theories and approaches for counselling
and family therapy.
/ I
BLOCK 1 INTRODUCTION TO
COUNSELLING AND FAMILY
THERAPY
Introduction
6
Block 1 is on "Introduction to Counselling and Family Therapy". It will acquaint
you with the basic concepts, key features and various approaches to counselling
and family therapy. The Block also describes career counselling and family
theories in practice. The Block consists of four Units.
Unit 1is entitled "Counselling: Meaning, Scope and Applications". This Unit
describes the concept of counselling, its scope and applications. The various
approaches in counselling are discussed in this Unit. The Unit elaborates the
steps and principles in counselling. Futher, the techniques and skills involved
in the process of counselling are described. The distinguishing features of
individual and family counselling as well as difference between counselling and
psychotherapy are discussed. At the end of this Unit some do's and don'ts
in counselling are mentioned.
Unit 2 is "Family Therapy: Meaning, Scope and Applications". This Unit
provides an overview of the functions of the family, the distinguishing features
of healthy and dysfunctional families. The concept of family therapy, its scope
and applications are described in this Unit. The major approaches and models
of family therapy are explained in detail. The various ways to assess family
patterns are also discussed. Further, the Unit provides knowledge on the
treatment teachniques across various family therapy approaches. The Unit also
outlines the various phases of therapy. The issues related to resistance and ethics
are also discussed at the end of this Unit.
Unit 3 is on "Career Counselling". As the name suggests, the focus of this
Unit is on career counselling. The Unit begins with the meaning of career
counselling and its need. The distinctive features of career counselling are
explained in this Unit. Some factors like family, peers, social norms and life
events influence the career related decisions. The Unit explains all these factors
in detail. The Unit also aquaints you with the knowledge of various theories
of career counselling, like trait factor theory, structural theories, developmental
theories, decision making theories, social learning theory and community
interaction theory. Some of the important techniques of career counselling are
card sorts, aptitude test, vocational interest, inventories, personal inventory, etc.
which are described in this Unit. At the end of this Unit, the process of career
counselling is described. The Unit also elaborates the importance of career
counselling in today's context.
Unit 4 is "FamilyTheories in Practice". The Unit has three parts. The first
part of this Unit deals with crisis theory. It includes introduction of crisis theory
and key concepts of this theory. The various types of crisis and stages of crisis
are also explained. The intervention or applicability of this theory in day-today life is discussed at the end. The next part is on empowerment theory. The
introduction to theory and key concepts of empowerment theory are explained
in this part. The different levels and expressions of empowerment are discussed
in detail. Empowered families have specific characteristics which are described
in this part of the Unit. Intervention of this theory is given at the end. The
later part of this Unit deals with the intergenerational theory. It includes the
introduction and key concepts of this theory. The applicability of intergenerational
theory is explained at the end of this Unit.
/
-.UNIT 1 COUNSELLING: MEANING,
SCOPE AND APPLICATIONS
Structure
1.1 Introduction
1.2 Concept of Counselling
1.3 Individual Versus Family Counselling
1.4 Family Counselling
1.5 Counselling and Psychotherapy
1.6 Key Principles for Counselling
1.7 Steps in Counselling process
1.8 Key Factors for Success in Counselling
1.8.1 Willingness
1.8.2 Motivation
1.8.3 Commitment
1.8.4 Faith
1.9 Models for Counselling
1.9.1 Humanistic Approach to Therapy
1.9.2 Cognitive Behavioural Therapy
1.9.3 Social Learning and Operant Models
1.9.4 Integrative Approach to Counselling
1.10 Counselling Methods and Focus
1.11 Basic Counselling Skills
1.11.1 Step 1: Attending
1.11.2 Step 2: Responding
1.11.3 Step 3: Personalising
1.12 Listening and Responding Techniques
1.13 Counsellor Skills, Qualities and Ethics
1.14 Confidentiality
1.15 Termination of Counselling
1.16 Let Us Sum Up
1.17 Glossary
1.18 Answers to Check Your Progress Exercises
1.19 Unit End Questions
1.20 Further Readings and References
7
/ I
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
~.
~'.
8
1.1 INTRODUCTION
We live in a complex, busy and changing world. In this world, people experience
many difficult situations. Most of the time, we get on with life, but sometimes
we are disturbed by an event or situation and our resources fail to sort it out.
Most. of the time, we find ways of dealing with such problems in living by
talking to family, friends, neighbours, priests or our family doctor. However,
.occasionally their advice become insufficient, or we are too embarrassed or
ashamed to tell them what is bothering us, or we just do not have an appropriate
person to turn to. Counselling is a useful option in such a case. Counselling
is initiated when the person faces a problem that she or he feels inadequate
to handle without any assistance from a professional or helping person. It is
also a social institution that is embedded in the culture of modem industrialised
societies. It is an occupation, discipline or profession of relatively recent origins.
Objectives
After studying this Unit, you will be able to:
• Understand the basic concepts related to counselling;
• Distinguish between counselling and psychotherapy and family therapy;
• Understand the principles of counselling;
• Identify the various approaches to counselling; and
• Describe effective counselling techniques.
~CONCEPT OF COUNSELLING J
• The term counselling includes work with individuals and with relationships
that may be developmental, crisis support, psychotherapeutic, guiding or
problem solving. It may be practised within a counselling or other
professional work setting, or in private practice on a paid or voluntary
basis.
• The task of counselling is to give the 'client' an opportunity to explore,
discover and clarify ways of living more satisfyingly and resourcefully.
Maintaining good standards of counselling involves continuous self-monitoring
and self-development on the part of the counsellor.
• Counselling is a goal-oriented process, which emphasizes a cooperative role
relationship between provider and recipient. When counselling, the provider
applies his or her expertise to benefit each recipient, directing them to use
information in a way that serves best in everyday life. In short, it is a process
of helping someone to recognize, face, accept and resolve problems.
• GThe term counselling includes a wide array of activities: assessing knowledge
and motivation, providing information, modifying inappropriate behaviour,
reinforcing desired behaviour, and monitoring long-term progress.
• Counselling is a form of psychotherapy, usually far more brief in the length
of time clients receive in traditional psychotherapy, that aims to assist people
who are experiencing problems in various areas including relationship
problems, academic or school related problems, depression, anxiety, trauma,
and issues from the past that negatively affect the person's daily functioning
(Corey, 2004).
1.3 INDIVIDUAL VERSUS FAMILY
COUNSELLING
In individual counselling only the person (client) in question with problems would
be taken up for counselling sessions whereas in family counselling the whole
family or at least concerned family members decide to work through relationships
to improve family communication.
1.4 FAMILY COUNSELLING
Family counselling is an umbrella term for a number of therapeutic approaches
all of which treat the family as a whole rather than singling out specific individuals
for independent treatment. According to Burke (1989), "it is an artful application
of scientifically derived psychological knowledge and techniques for the purpose
of changing human behaviour". In simple words, family counselling can be
understood as follows:
• Family counselling is an effective way to help family members understand
problems and make positive changes in their lives.
• In family counselling the whole family decides to work through their
relationships to improve family communication.
• The family looks at how to solve a problem or adjust to a new situation.
• Family counselling also includes marital counselling with married couples
according to the law of the land or married with religious ceremonies.
• It may also include or be followed by couples therapy, which treats
relationship problems between marriage partners or gay couples; and the
extension of family therapy to religious communities or other groups that
resemble families such as couples cohabiting together or in 'live-in'
relationships or relationships prior to marriage.
• The usual types of problems dealt with are relationship problems, including
separation and divorce, family of origin issues, parenting skills, parent-child
conflict and elder abuse.
1.5 COUNSELLING AND PSYCHOTHERAPY
The words counselling and psychotherapy are frequently used interchangeably
and are based on very similar types of treatments, though you can find differences
between them that distinguish one from another. In actual practice there may
be quite a bit of overlap between the two types of interventions. A therapist
/
Counselling: Meaning,
Scope and Applications
9
I
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
10
may provide counselling with specific situations and a counsellor may function
in a psychotherapeutic manner. Generally, speaking, however, psychotherapy
requires more skill than simple counselling. It is conducted by professionals
trained to practise psychotherapy such as a psychiatrist, a trained counsellor,
social worker or psychologist. While a psychotherapist is qualified to provide
counselling, a counsellor mayor may not possess the necessary training and
skillsto provide psychotherapy.
Technically speaking, "counsellor" means "advisor". It involves two people
working together to solve a problem. It is a term that is used in conjunction
with many types of advice giving. For example, financial planning and career
guidance are both types of counselling. Just about anyone at all times may claim
to be a counsellor if they are in the role of giving advice. In the realm of mental
health, the term counselling is generally used to denote a rather short, solutionfocused treatment process. The focus of counselling is commonly on addressing,
and alleviating, a specific symptom or frustrating circumstances as quickly as
possible. For mental health practitioners, counselling has more of an instructional
and professional support or advice-giving character. The territory a counsellor
covers with clients frequently is more specialized, like addiction counselling or
guidance counselling.
Psychotherapy, on the other hand, is a term that refers to the "treatment of
mental and emotional disorders through the use of psychological techniques
designed to encourage communication of conflicts and insights into problems,
with the goal being personality growth and behaviour modification" (American
Heritage Dictionary). Psychotherapy can be a time-consuming, expensive
process. It is generally a long term treatment which focuses more on gaining
insight into chronic physical and emotional problems. Its focus is on the patient's
thought processes and way of being in the world rather than specific problems.
In short, psychotherapy is a longer-term treatment that concentrates on
addressing long-held beliefs and behaviours that no longer benefit the client.
Though very specific issues are frequently dealt with in psychotherapy, the focus
is on the client's thought processes and relationship with themselves, others,
and the world.
Both psychotherapy and counselling are helpful, each has their use, and they
are definitely not mutually exclusive. Irrespective of the approach to which one
subscribes, the differences between psychotherapy and counselling do exist. The
interchangeable use of the terms, however, typically sparks neither controversy
nor confusion.
1. Write a short note on family counselling.
Check Your Progress Exercise 1
Note: a) Read the following question carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answer with that provided at the end of this Unit.
/
1.6 KEY PRINCIPLES FOR COUNSELLING
i) Counselling is cooperative in nature, which is usually a two-way process
and requires active participation from both the counsellor and the client
or counsellee. The working process requires that both client and counsellor
take up reciprocal, complementary roles. Each one, that is, the counsellor
and client comes with a personal agenda. The counsellor is responsible
for developing rapport and for directing the course of progress.
ii) Counselling is goal-directed the aim is for the client to find a solution to
an identified problem. The counsellor shares her or his knowledge in such
a form that the client can use it to solve the particular problem independently.
Through counselling, the client will learn to apply knowledge in new ways,
may acquire new skills, or change some of her or his beliefs or behaviours
which may be maladaptive.
iii) Counselling is usually client-centered. The needs and views of the client!
counsellee have to be respected. The counsellor must always be sensitive
to introducing only culturally appropriate or sensitive interventions and avoid
coercing, ordering, patronizing, or acting on the client's behalf. She or he
is rather like a skilled guide, finding out where the client wants to go and
assisting in determining if the destination is reasonable and/or feasible. She
or he assists the client in seeking alternative routes, determining their
respective difficulties, and discusses the choice of route. She or he helps
the client to clear out the obstacles along the way. The client may, at some
point, require more precise guidance in practising new skills that are
necessary, to make the journey smooth and without difficulties.
1.7 STEPS IN COUNSELLING PROCESS
The five-stepmodel of family counselling is significant in managing the progression
through the sessions. These steps help the counsellor to organize the various
tasks involved in each of these sessions. They act as reminders to the counsellor
of where the emphasis is meant to be during any given session. It is also necessary
to complete the specific tasks of each step before moving on to the next step.
The steps in counselling process have been discussed underneath .
•
Assess: In the first step the counsellor collects, selects and analyses information
to enable her or him to make decisions. Counselling calls for information that
the client alone can provide. The counsellor always begins at the client's level
of understanding. The counsellor works to involve the client in the process of
defining targets and determining goals and objectives of each session.
Advise: The second step is to do with 'Advise'. It is not practical as also
feasible to take on too many targets simultaneously. Generally, counselling is
more effective when the client himself or herself selects the target behaviour
on which to focus. The initial targets should be highly concrete and the client's
own actions should lead to quick and clearly visible changes in them. As and
when required, the counsellor/therapist should help the decision-making process
with her or his knowledge of the condition or situation.
Agree: The third step is to 'Agree'; here the counsellor has the responsibility
for the proper assessment of problems, for the formulation of the targets, and
for the suitability of the suggested management. A plan will be drawn at this
/
Counselling: Meaning,
Scope and Applications
11
1
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
12
stage, which should state the short-term objectives, and trace a method most
likely to lead away from the current situation. Often a written agreement or
contract clarifies the respective responsibilities.
Assist: The fourth step is to 'Assist', where courses of action which should
be generated together with the client, always concentrating on the direction from
the current situation to the nearest immediate objective are chalked out. At this
stage, the responsibility for actions rests with the client; she or he should try
out the suggestions agreed upon, according to the plan, and bring back
experiences for discussion and evaluation together. Common elements in many
behaviour change counselling situations include moral support, skill training,
environmental change, relapse prevention, and maintenance techniques. The
c<?unsellor's task lies in identifying the client's particular needs for instruction,
and practical training. This step of implementation may take several sessions.
Arrange: The fifth and final step is to 'Arrange' the means to achieve the goals.
Counselling requires that the actions taken undergo continuous monitoring for
the changes. It is often necessary to arrange for additional skill development
through community services or programmes. It is essential to find out throughout
the duration of the counselling, to what extent the client has followed the course
of action agreed upon in the previous sessions. By the final session, the client
needs to have a clear picture of the changes she or he has made and of what
her or his own efforts have achieved.
In a nutshell, the counsellor needs to:
1. Establish a safe, conducive and a trusting environment for the client.
2. Clarify, that is, help the client put their concerns or difficulties into clear
words or statements.
3. Be an active listener and try to find out the client's needs and concerns.
In the process of active listening the counsellor needs ,to:
a) paraphrase, summarize, reflect, interpret, and
b) focus on feelings, not situations or events.
4. Transform problem statements into goal statements.
5. Explore possible approaches to goal or generate alternatives to the fulfillment
of the goal.
6. Help person in choosing one way or other towards the fulfillment of the
goal.
7. Develop a plan of action make a contract to fulfill the plan of action decided
upon.
8. Summarize what has occurred, clarify, and get verification.
9. Evaluate progress from time to time. Get feedback and confirmation. Here
there is a need to assess whether the alternatives chosen have worked
and the problems have been sorted out or whether there is a need to
plan further action by helping the client to choose another option and monitor
the success or failure. Continual feedback and monitoring may be sometimes
necessary.
/
Check Your Progress Exercise 2
Note: a) Read the following question carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answer with that provided at the end of this Unit.
1. What are the key principles for counselling?
1.8 KEY FACTORS FOR SUCCESS IN
COUNSELLING
There are four key factors, or four key steps to being successful in the counselling
process as has been described by Kersey (2009). These are discussed below:
1.8.1 Willingness
Many clients who may require counselling either will not seek it or they come
for therapy but are not willing to make any recommended changes. They want
their significant others to change; they want their environment or circumstances
to change but they are resistant to work and bring about changes themselves.
Seeking help and making changes in life requires courage and if the client is
willing to be different, she or he can adapt to the changes.
1.8.2 Motivation
In addition to willingness, motivation is an important component of counselling.
Without a strong drive for change, it is less likely to occur. When an individual
has both the willingness to improve and the motivation to do so, they have
half of what it required to succeed in the counselling process.
1.8.3 Commitment
The old adage "quitters never win and winners never quit" basically says it all.
However, people tend to be impatient with the personal growth process and
want things immediately. The counselling process requires commitment and
patience. Without these two characteristics, many will hurry into what they think
is a viable solution but eventually discover that actually the problem has not
been resolved at all.
1.8.4 Faith
Faith is the final and most critical step in the success of counselling. The concept
of belief and confidence in oneself or belief in a process seems simple and
necessary to accomplish the goals of the client. Each person fails when they
have little or no faith in the healing process or the change that follows because
of it. Clients need to realize that a certain amount of trust needs to be possessed
in a well-trained counsellor or at least explore their lack of trust issues with
the therapist in the beginning phase of counselling.
Counselling: Meaning,
Scope and Applications
13
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy Check Your Progress Exercise 3
Note: a) J3..eadthe following question carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answer with that provided at the end of this Unit.
1. List down the important factors that are vital for the success of
counselling.
1.9 MODELS FOR COU~SELLING
Some of the common models of counselling are given below:
1.9.1 Humanistic Approach to Therapy
Humanistic approach to therapy is briefly described in following points:
• It emphasizes the importance of being aware of one's emotions and feeling
free to express them.
• The therapy focuses on discovery of true emotions and personal goals.
• The source of the problem is identified which is blocking the full
development due to restricted growth potential.
• The techniques in therapy used are conversations, largely guided by the
client.
Types of humanistic therapies:
Here, we would discuss the following types of humanistic therapies:
1) Person-centered therapy,
2) Gestalt therapy, and
3) . Existential therapy.
1. Person-Centered Therapy
This therapy is also known as Client-centered therapy. It was developed
by Carl Rogers. Its main features in brief are as follows:
• This form of therapy uses reflection, genuineness, and accurate empathy
to help clients come up with their own solutions to their problems
and to help promote self-understanding and acceptance.
• It provides a safe therapeutic climate, reflection and clarification of
what the client says. In contrast to the psychodynamic therapist, the
client-centered therapist does little to interpret, direct, or advise the
client.
• Its basic premise is that the social values (conditions of worth) imposed
on the individual by society underlie self-actualization.
The important skills of counsellor or therapist in person-centered
14 therapy include the following:
/
• Empathy: The therapist looks at life from the client's perspective.
She or he must have empathy by active involvement in the client's
world by imagining what it would be like to be the client.
•. Genuineness: The counsellor or therapist should show honesty with
client. Therapists need to let their inner feelings appear open and honest
during therapy.
• Unconditional positive regard: The counsellor or therapist shows
warmth and caring for the client. It entails caring acceptance of the
client's individuality regardless of what the client says or does.
• Reflection: It involves mirroring back of client's emotions.
The person-centered counsellor uses the methods of (1) active and
passive listening, (2) reflection of thoughts and feelings, (3) clarification,
(4) summarization, (5) confrontation of contradictions, and (6) general
or.open leads that help the client in self-exploration. These at times
are collectively labeled as active listening.
2. Gestalt Therapy
This therapy was developed by Fritz Perls. It is rooted in the following
assumptions:
• This form of therapy is more directive than person-centered therapy
and challenges clients to face their true feelings and to act on them.
• It encourages direct expression of emotion by client (can be
confrontational).
• It focuses on the present rather than past or future.
• It emphasizes the importance of increasing an accurate perception of
reality.
• When perceptions become abnormally inaccurate, they can lead to
psychopathology.
Techniques used in Gestalt therapy are as follows:
• Therapist as an example: Therapist sets example for client by being
an open and aware person.
• Role-play: Therapist and/or client engages in role play to help the
client manage feelings.
• Nonverbal-behaviour congruence: Therapist encourages client to be
in touch with whether verbal behaviour matches nonverbal behaviour.
3. Existential Therapy
It was developed by 'Frankl and May. It is based on the following
assumptions:
• Existential therapists assume that emotional and behavioural problems
stem from an inability to cope with the ultimate issues of life.
• Existential therapists try to make their clients aware of the importance
of free choice and the fact that they have the ultimate responsibility
for making their own choices about their lives, and that they may I
choose to make their own meaning to live a purposeful life. Clients
are encouraged to take responsibility solely for their happiness (we
have to be able to stand alone before we can stand beside another).
/
Counselling: Meaning,
Scope and Applications
15
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
16
• Client-counsellor relationship is the key issue. Other theories are drawn
upon as necessary.
1.9.2 Cognitive Behavioural Therapy (CBT)
Cognitive behavioural therapy (CBT) is a structured and directive, brief and
time-limited therapy with an emphasis placed on current behaviour. It is based
on the notion that maladaptive behaviours are the result of skill deficits, and
that thoughts cause feelings and behaviours. It is also based on the assumption
that most emotional and behavioural reactions are learned. Therefore, the goal
of therapy is to help clients unlearn their unwanted reactions and to learn a
new way of reacting. CBT is a collaborative effort between the therapist and
the client.
In CBT the client's role involves defining goals, expressing concerns, learning,
and implementing learning.
The role of the therapist or counsellor is to help the client define goals, listen,
teach, and encourage.
Homework is a central feature of CBT. Cognitive therapies do not appear to
work as well with those who are cognitively impaired. CBT has been effective
for use with problems in the following areas:
• Self or personal growth,
• Individual clients or groups,
• Marriage or family relationships,
• Workplace problems,
• Child or adolescent behaviour disorders,
• Eating disorders, addictions, and impulse control disorders,
• Anger management,
• Adjustment to chronic health problem, physical disability, or mental disorder,
and
• Post-traumatic stress disorder.
1.9.3 Social Learning and Operant Models
These models focus on the stimuli that elicit or reinforce a specific behaviour,
such as Skinner's and Pavlov's conditioning approaches to behaviour change.
Bandura's "Social Learning Theory" emphasizes the immediate social reinforcing
consequences when attempting behaviour change: three critical elements are selfefficacy, modeling, and self-management. New ways of behaving occur through
imitation and modeling, and by observing the behaviour of others.
1.9.4 Integrative Approach to Counselling
Integrative counselling and psychotherapy is the process of selecting concepts
and methods from a variety of systems. Surveys of clinical and counselling
psychologists consistently reveal that 30 percent to 50 percent of the respondents
consider themselves eclectic or integrative in their therapeutic practice. Eclectic
practice consists of picking of techniques from various approaches. One reason
for the trend toward integration is the recognition that no single theory is
comprehensive enough to account for the complexities of human behaviour,
especially when the range of client types and their specific problems are taken
into consideration.
••1. Enumerate the important models for counselling.
Check Your Progress Exercise 4
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space
provided below ..
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this Unit.
2. What is humanistic approach to therapy? Outline the key features of this
approach.
1.10 COUNSELLING METHODS AND FOCUS
Following assessment, the counsellor suggests treatment options, including referral
if the problem is one requiring medical support and intervention. If short-term
counselling is recommended, the counsellor would suggest one of the following
approaches:
• Cognitive behavioural interventions, such as use of discussion, behavioural
strategies, suggestions, and assignments geared toward using thoughts and
behaviours to prepare for and cope with symptoms and stressors.
Cognitive behavioural therapy for families is brief and solution-focused, and
addresses a wide range of psychological problems (for example, depression,
anxiety, anger outbursts, acting out behaviour, obesity, aqdictions, coping
with physical illness, etc.). In case of children and families there may be
need for parent training, divorce counselling, stress management, skill training
and so on. Patterns, especially around issues of conflict, are examined to
identify the roots of the problem, as well as the goals of counselling.
• The work is focused on helping the family members to think and behave
more adaptively, and to learn to make better choices in efforts to get needs
met, so that the family environment becomes more stable and peaceful.
Insight, empathy, respect, and caring are enhanced with family members
who have invested in the treatment. When working with families, therapists
and counsellors often see members individually as well as together, to get
a full picture of the issues involved, and to work more in depth with each
individual regarding their role or contribution to the family's problematic
patterns. The family meetings are forums in which perspectives and
experiences are shared, and increased understanding and problem solving
occurs. Throughout the course of treatment, progress is made toward
improved family functioning.
/
Counselling: Meaning,
Scope and Applications
17

Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
18
• Person-centered therapy is applicable in situation of crisis intervention, such
as death of loved ones, chronic and life threatening physical or mental
illnesses and unwanted pregnancy.
• Skillstraining, including effective communication and relationship skills,study
skills, stress management, time management, and self care strategies are
used for managing conflict and communication, increasing intimacy, handling
substance abuse, work and school related issues, blended family issues,
and a range of other concerns.
• Use of experiential techniques like imagery, role play, and other expressive
activities are used especially in situations calling for resolution of emotional
conflicts, such as those involving grief, loss, trauma, or illness.
• Psychoeducational intervention are made to educate the client(s) about
personal, interpersonal, or intrapersonal psychological matters affecting
herself or himself or others. This may include the provision of consultation
about the problems of a third party, an explanation of relationship dynamics,
or information related to a specific psychological disorder.
• Crisis intervention strategies, especially interventions in which the focus is
on gaining or maintaining immediate safety, coping, and/or stability in an
emergency such as loss grief, death, bereavement, developmental transitions
- puberty, marriage, job change or job loss, retirement and so on.
With city living, increasing demands of work and educational attainments, dual
working homes, financial pressures, parenting issues and the general change of
the traditional nuclear family, the stress on families can be overwhelming. With
client's strengths, goals and work, an empathic and non-judgmental counsellor
can help to achieve the client's goals.
1.11 BASIC COUNSELLING SKILLS
Following Carkhuff Model, the following skills provide an important basis for
all effective counselling efforts.
1.11.1 Step 1: Attending
Purpose/Functions:
i) Promotes the client's own attentiveness; and
ii) Allows the helper to receive verbal and non-verbal cues.
It involves active listening. The helper should suspend judgement; resist
distractions; recall the expression; look for themes; and wait to respond.
It also includes:
• Concentrating,
• Showing interest,
• Positioning,
• Observing (part of attending): It is focussed on body language; facial
expressions; congruency of behaviour; dress; energy level; health; appearance.
1.11.2 Step 2: Responding
The relevant skills involve responding to feelings, to content, or to meaning.
Meaning involves feeling and content.
Purpose:
i) To facilitate client's exploration;
ii) Gives the helper a chance to check her or his level of understanding;
iii) Clarifies the context within which those feelings occur; and
iv) Lays a base.
Responding to feeling involves the following steps:
• Attending to the client,
• Listening to the client,
• Observing the client,
• Merging with the client,
• Suspending our own frame of reference,
• Presenting no mask,
• Developing feeling words and interchangeable responses,
• Checking out the feeling expression, and
• Responding to feelings "You feeL .."
Responding to meaning involves the following steps:
• Reflect upon the content
• Supply the content
• Provide a reason
• Rephrase the content "You feel... because ...."
• Respond to content "You're saying that.. .."
• Respond to meaning "You feeL .. because ..."
1.11.3 Step 3: Personalising
The purpose of personalising is to attempt to enable the client to understand
what she or he is in relation to, where she or he wants to be.
It involves the following models of interaction:
1. Personalizing the meaning "You feel ... because you ....",
ll. Personalising the problem "You feel ... because you cannot...",
ID. Personalising the feeling "You feel ... because you can't.. ..",
Counselling: Meaning,
Scope and Applications
19

Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
20
IV. Personalising the goal "You feel... because you can't.... and you want to...",
and
v. Personalising understanding.
Check Your Progress Exercise 5
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this Unit.
1. List down the steps that provide a base for all effective counselling efforts.
2. Fill in the blanks:
i) The counsellor will suggest... , including referral
if the problem is one requiring medical support and intervention.
ii). Cognitive behavioural therapy for families is .
and .
iii) Patterns, especially around issue of conflict, are examined to identify
the of the problem as well as the
............................ of counselling.
iv) Psychoeducational interventions in which the clients are educated
about. , or
....................... psychological matters.
1.12 LISTENING AND RESPONDING
TECHNIQUES
Type Purpose Possible response
Clarifying 1 To get additional 1. Can you clarify this?
facts. 2. Do you mean this?
2. To help the person 3. Is this the problem as
explore all sides of you see it now?
the problem.
Restatement 1. To check meaning 1. As I understand it, your
and interpretation plan is....
with the other. 2. Is this what you have
2. To show you are decided to do? And the
listening and that you reasons are?
understand what the 3. You said ....
other has said. 4. You're saying...
------------------ •... _---------
/
r------------------------------
Type Purpose Possible response
Neutral 1. To convey that you are 1. I see.
interested and listening. 2. I understand.
2. To encourage the person 3. That is a good point.
to continue talking.
Reflective 1. To show that you 1. You feel that.. ..
understand how the 2. It was shocking as
other feels about what you saw it.
she or he is saying. 3. You felt you didn't
2. To help the person to get a fair hearing.
evaluate and temper her
or his own feelings as
expressed by someone
else.
Summarizing 1. To bring all the 1. These are the key
discussion into focus in ideas you have
terms of a summary. expressed.
2. To serve as a 2. If I understand how
springboard to you feel about the
discussion of new situation,....
aspects of the problem.
Some Do's and Don'ts
Do's Don'ts
• Show interest • Argue
• Have understanding of • Interrupt
the other person • Pass judgement too quickly or in
• Express empathy advance
• Single out the problem if • Give advice unless it is requested
there is one by the other
Listen for causes of the Jump to conclusions •
• •
problem • Let the speaker's emotions impact
• Help the speaker too directly on your own
associate the problem
with the cause
• Encourage the speaker
to develop competence
and motivation to solve
her or his own problems
• Cultivate the ability to
be silent when silence is
needed
/
Counselling: Meaning,
Scope and Applications
21
1
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
22
1.13 COUNSELLOR SKILLS, QUALITIES AND
ETIDCS
A brief summary of the skills, qualities and ethical issues involved in counselling is
given in followingTable:
SKILLS QUALITIES ETHICS
Verbal • Genuine • Acceptance
• Minimal encouragers
• Respectful • Non-judgemental
('ha', 'uhh', continue)
attitude
Appropriate tone of •
• Warm
• Controlled VOIce • Appropriately serious
emotional
• Simple, precise language
• Empathic involvement
• Accurate reflection of
feelings • Moves at client's • Purposeful
Linking feelingsto
pace expression of
•
feeling
expenence • Shows interest
Non-verbal
• Individuality
• Facing squarely • Confidentiality
• Open posture • Client self-
• Leaning forward determination
• Eye contact
• Reasonably relaxed
• Appropriate hand and
facialmovements
1.14 CONFIDENTIALITY
Confidentiality normally means that anything discussed during a counselling
•
session is held as private and not discussed elsewhere. The information cannot
be given to anyone or any agency unless client has given permission (and client
is over 18 years). If client is under 18 years, both the parents of client need
to agree to the information being given out. If they cannot agree the court may
take a decision. This is essential to the client feeling safe in speaking about
intimate and painful matters.
A counsellor may (but does not have to) give information to another person
(or an agency) if the same:
• is necessary to protect a child from harm (both physical and psychological);
• is necessary to protect someone's life or health or property;
• may prevent a crime involving violence or threats of violence or report
a crime involving threats or violence; and
• will assist a lawyer independently representing a child's/c1ient's interests.
/
1.15 TERMINATION OF COUNSELLING
Counselling is terminated under following conditions:
• If the therapist has negotiated a specific number of sessions with the family
at the outset, termination is relatively straightforward.
• Counselling ends when the client and the counsellor agree that progress
is satisfactory.
• When it is determined by the counsellor that an alternative form of
intervention is needed and options discussed and explored that a plan for
obtaining further intervention can be developed.
• Termination is usually smoother when the counsellor is clear about the
objectives: delineating problems, setting goals and formulating outcome
criteria.
• Counselling ends when a client decides that she or he is not ready to work
on a problem with _acounsellor at that particular time.
Check Your Progress Exercise 6
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this Unit.
1. List the different types of listening and responding techniques.
2. What are the essential qualities of a good counsellor?
3. What is confidentiality in counselling process?
/'
Counselling: Meaning,
Scope and Applications
23
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
24
1.16 LET US SUM UP
Counselling is a goal-oriented process, which emphasizes a cooperative role
relationship between provider and recipient. Family Counselling is an umbrella
term for a number of therapeutic approaches all of which treat the family as
a whole rather than singling out specific individuals for independent treatment.
Family counselling is an effective way to help family members understand
problems and make positive changes in their lives.
Counselling and psychotherapy are viewed as overlapping areas of professional
competence and there is a need to distinguish between these two treatment
modalities.
There are some key principles for counselling such as:
• Cooperative nature of work demanding active participation from both the
provider and the recipient;
• Goal-directed aim is for the recipient to find an answer to an identified
question or a solution to her or his specific problem; and
• Client-centered needs and views of the recipient have to be respected.
There are several steps involved in counselling which are best represented by
5 P:s that are: Assess, Advise, Agree, Assist and Arrange. Each step is important
and has specific goals leading finally to resolution of the problems.
There are four key factors or steps to being successful in the counselling process.
These are willingness, motivation, commitment, and faith. Some of the common
models of counselling are - person-centered therapy; gestalt therapy and
existential therapy.
Some of the effective characteristics of an effective counsellor are empathy,
genuineness, unconditional positive regard and reflection as emphasized in person
centered counselling as stated by Carl Rogers.
The cognitive behaviour model id counselling has a significant role in treating
many disorders. However, in the contemporary scenario an integrative approach
to counselling in therapeutic practice is preferred.
The basic counselling skills are attending, responding and personalizing. The
issues related to confidentiality, resistance and termination have to be looked
into in counselling.
1.17 GLOSSARY
Active listening Involves paraphrasing and summarizing the
person's emotions back to them, asking
questions to help them express what they
feel or believe or asking questions to achieve
a better understanding of what the person
is saying.
/
Cognitive therapy Any of a variety of techniques in
psychotherapy that utilizes guided selfdiscovery, imaging, self-instruction, symbolic
modeling, and related forms of explicitly
elicited cognitions as the principal mode of
treatment.
Counselling: Meaning,
Scope and Applications
Genuineness (Congruence) The counsellor is authentic and genuine.
Empathic understanding The counsellor accurately understands the
client's thoughts, feelings and meanings from
the client's own perspective.
Warmth Also called "unconditional positive regard".
It involves accepting and caring about the
client as a person, regardless of any
evaluation of her or his behaviours or
thoughts. It is most often communicated
through our non-verbal behaviour.
Unconditional positive regard: Means that the counsellor accepts the client
unconditionally and non-judgementally. The
client is free to explore all thoughts and
feelings, positive or negative, without danger
of rejection or condemnation,
Respect The belief in the client's ability to make
appropriate decisions and deal appropriately
with her or his life situation, when given
a safe and supportive environmentin which
to do so.
1.18 ANSWERS TO CHECK YOUR PROGRESS
EXERCISES
Check Your Progress Exercise 1
1. Family counselling is an umbrella term for a number of therapeutic
approaches which treat the family as a whole rather than singling out a
specific individual for independent treatment. The whole family decides to
work through their relationships to improve family communications. Family
looks at how to solve a problem or adjust to a 'new situation.
i) Counselling is a cooperative mode of work demanding active participation
from both the provider and the recipient.
Check Your Progress Exercise 2
1. Following are the key principles for counselling:
ii) Counselling is goal-oriented process. The aim of counselling for the
recipient is to find an answer to an identified question or a solution
to her or his specific problems. 25
/
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
26
ill) Counselling is best characterized by client-centeredness. The needs
and views of the recipient have to be respected.
Check Your Progress Exercise 3
1. D Willingness,
ii) Motivation,
ill) Commitment, and
iv) Faith.
Check Your Progress Exercise 4
1. Following are the important models for counselling:
i) Humanistic approach to therapy,
ii) Cognitive behavioural therapy,
ill) Social learning and operant models, and
iv) Integrative approach to counselling.
2. Humanistic approach to therapy emphasizes the importance of being aware
of one's emotions and feeling free to express them. The therapy focuses
on discovering true emotions and personal goals. The source of the problem
is identified which is blocking the full development due to restricted growth
potential. The technique used is conversations, largely guided by the client.
The three types of humanistic therapies are person-centered therapy, gestalt
therapy and existential therapy.
Check Your Progress Exercise 5
1. Following are the steps that provide a base for effective counselling:
i) Attending,
ii) Responding, and
ill) Personalising.
2 i) Treatment options,
ii) brief, solution focused,
ill) roots, goals,
iv) personal, interpersonal, intrapersonal
Check Your Progress Exercise 6
1. Following are the different types of listening and responding techniques:
i) Clarifying,
ii) Restatement,
/
iii) Neutral, Counselling: Meaning,
Scope and Applications
iv) Reflective; and
v) Summarising.
2. A good counsellor is:
i) Genuine,
ii) Respectful,
iii) Wann,
iv) Appropriately serious,
v) Empathic,
vi) Moves at client's pace, and
vii) Shows interest.
3. Confidentiality normally means that anything discussed during a counselling
session is held as private and not discussed without permission. The
information cannot be given to anyone or any agency unless client has given
persmission (and client is over 18 years). If client is under 18 years, both
the parents of client need to agree to the information being given out.
1.19 UNIT END QUESTIONS
1. What are the differences between psychotherapy and counselling?
~.
2. Write a 'brief note on models of counselling.
3. What are the indications of family counselling?
1.20 FURTHER READINGS AND REFERENCES
Active listening. Retrieved from http://www.studygs.netllistening.htm
Archer, J.J. & McCarthy, C.J. (2007). Theories of counselling and
Psychotherapy. Contemporary Applications: Pearson-Pre itice Hall.
bacp : ethical framework: values of counselling and psychotherapy. Retrieved
from: http://www.bacp.co.uklethical_frameworklvalues.php
bacp : ethical framework: Personal moral qualities. Retrieved from http://
www.bacp.co.uklethical_frameworklpersonal.php
bacp : ethical framework: Personal moral qualities Retrieved from http://
www.bacp.co.uklethical_frameworklpersonal.php
Carkhuff, R.R. (2000). The Art of helping in the 21st Century. Amherst,
MA: Human Resource Development Press, Inc.
/
27
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
•
28
Clinton, T. & Ohlschager, GW. (Eds.). (2002). Counselling - Theory and
practice (Fourth Edition). (Part Two: Theoretical Approaches to Counselling.
Boston: AUyn and Bacon.
Corey, G (2001). Theory and practice of counselling and psychology.
Belmont, CA: Brooks/Cole
Corsini, lR & Wedding, D., (1995). Current psychotherapies. F.E. Peacock
Publishers Inc., Itasca, IL.
Counselling and Psychotherapy. Retrieved from http://www.canadiantaskforce.ca/
does/Counselling;'TR.pdf
Listening effectively. Retrieved from http://www.wright.edul-scott.williams/skills/
listening.htm
Meier, S. & Davis, S. (2000). The elements of counselling (4th ed.).
Wadsworth Publishing.
National Association of Cognitive-Behavioural Therapists. Retrieved from http:1
Iwww.nacbt.orglwhatiscbt.htm
Noah, H. (2009). Key Steps to Success in Counselling http://www.athealth.coml
Practitioner/particles/guesCKerseyNH.html
Sharf, RS. (2004). Theories of psychotherapy and counselling, 3rd ed).
Brooks/Cole: Pacific Grove, CA.
Smith, RL. & Smith, P.S. (1992). Family counselling and therapy: Major
issues and topics. Eric Counselling and Personnel Services Clearing house
Michigan: Wadsworth.
Steps in the Counselling Process. Retrieved from http://www.proteuscoven.org/
proteus/steps.htm
Samuel, T. (2007). Counselling: A Comprehensive Profession, Updated
Edition (5th Edition).
Suggested Phrases to Demonstrate Active Listening Virginia Adult Learning
Resource Center 2003 www.careacademy.orglleamingresources/cc_activelt.pdf
The Do's and Don't's of Listening. Retrieved from http://www.scribd.comldoc/
270862391Listening- The-Do-s-and-Don- Ts .
Theory and Practice of Counselling,. Retrieved from http://free-books-online.orgl
psychology/theory-and-practice-of-counselling/counselling-process-counsellorqualities.
UNIT 2 FAMILY THERAPY: MEANING,
SCOPE AND APPLICATIONS
Structure
2.1 Introduction
2.2 Family Functions
2.2.1 Functions and Characteristics of Healthy Families
2.2.2 Dysfunctional Families
2.2.3 Characteristics of Dysfunctional Families
2.3 The Concept of Family Therapy
2.4 Difference Between Psychotherapy and Counselling
2.5 History of Family Therapy
2.6. Family Life Cycle
2.7 Indications and Countraindications for Family Therapy
2.8 Family Therapy: As a Process
2.9 Preparation for Family Therapy
2.10 Assessment in Family Therapy
2.10.1 Family Tree
2.10.2 Time Lines
2.10.3 Genograms
2.11 Major Family Therapy Approaches
2.11.1 Psychodynamic Approach
2.11.2 Family Systems Perspective
2.11.3 Strategic Therapy
2.11.4 Structural Family Therapy
2.11.5 Experiential Therapy
2.11.6 Cognitive Behavioural Therapy for Families
2.11.7 Narrative Family Therapy
2.11.8 Multigenerational Family Therapy
2.11.9 Object Relations
2.11.10 Eclectic Approach
2.12 Basic' Techniques in Marital and Family Therapy
2.12~1 The Genogram
2.12.2 The Family Floor Plan
2.12.3 Refrarning
2.12.4 Tracking
2.12.5 Joining
2.12.6 Family Sculpting
2.12.7 Building CommunicationSkills
2.12.8 Strategic Tasks
2.12.9 Restructuring
2.12.10 Circular Questioning 29
/ I
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
30
2.13
2.14
2.15
2.16
2.17
Resistance in Family Therapy
Ethical Issues in Family Therapy
Counselling Case Studies
Let Us Sum Up
Glossary
2.18 Answers to Check Your Progress Exercises
2.19 Unit End Questions
2.20 Further Readings and References
2.1 INTRODUCTION
In recent years, there have been changes about the notions of family and
family life. In many developed as well as developing countries', for example,
approximately over 40 per cent of new marriages end in divorce. Many people
choose not to marry and there are increasing variations, such as single-parent
families and homosexual families. In addition, there is greater diversity in people's
expectations such that men no longer are expected to be the sole or main
breadwinners and there are expectations about greater sharing of domestic roles,
such as childcare. Arguably, some of these changes are less extensive than might
be assumed. For example women, even if they work outside the home, tend
to take on the bulk of domestic duties as well.
It is easy to assume that in some ways the family is in 'crisis', which is also
seen as a fundamental threat to the stability of society. Some of the traditional
values, emphasizing domestic duties, passivity and primary responsibility for
providing care of children and ageing relatives have not been in the best interests
of women. What we take to be 'the family' and 'family life' is influenced by
the ideologies and discourses inherent in society. An analysis at the level of
society and culture suggests that 'family life' is shaped by dominant ideologies
or discourses about what family life should be like. For example, the roles of
men and women in families and other living arrangements have changed
significantly in the last 40 to 50 years. If we accept that many people make
such choices, the question remains of how people go about constructing their
own varieties of 'family life' . How do they decide how 'normal', as opposed
to how 'deviant' they will be? Accounts from families and therapists can be
seen to pertain to two aspects of family life, which at first sight might appear
contradictory: on the one hand, people do appear to make autonomous decisions
about their lives; on the other hand, family life can be seen to be characterized
by repetitive, predictable patterns of actions. Families are inevitably faced with
various tasks, difficulties and problems that they have to fmd ways of managing.
These tasks alter as they proceed through their developmental cycle.
Objectives
After studying this Unit, you will be able to:
• Understand the basic concepts related to family therapy;
• Identify the various approaches to family therapy;
• Analyse the indications (applications) and contraindications for family
therapy; and
• Assess families who are resistant/not amenable to family therapy.
/
2.2 FAMILYFUNCTIONS
,
The main functions performed by family are as follows:
1. Socialization of children
2. Economic cooperation and division of labour
3. Care, supervision, monitoring, and interaction
4. Legitimizing sexual relations
5. Reproduction
6. Provision of status like social-familial attributes for example, SES, location.
Status can be i) ascribed - for example, birth order or ii) achieved; means
based n individual's effort.
7. Affection, emotional support and companionship
2.2.1 Functions and Characteristics of Healthy Families
A functional family is characterized by transactions that serve to meet the needs
of the individuals in the family and the family unit as a whole. Functional families
are characterized by structures that are adaptable and well defined. The
characteristics of healthy family include the following:
• Clearly identified hierarchy,
• Well-defined parental roles,
• Flexibility and adaptability that means healthy families can respond to
situational and maturational crisis,
• Consistent, clear rules and expectations,
• Consistent affection,
• Consistent limit-setting,
• Open communication, bi-directional, and
• Increased degree of support, nurturance and acceptance of family members .
•
2.2.2 Dysfunctional Families
A dysfunctional family system occurs when a stressor overloads the family's
adaptive and coping mechanisms such that family members' needs are not
adequately met.
2.2.3 Characteristics of Dysfunctional Families
The characteristics of dysfunctional families are stated below:
• Rigidity or lack of flexibility,
". Lack ofindividuation like enmeshment or loss of autonomy,
• Extreme detachment,
• Scapegoating; means a family member (often child) is the object of displaced
conflict or criticism,
/
Family Therapy: Meaning,
Scope and Applications
31
I
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
32
• Triangulation, that means detouring conflict between two people by involving
a third person, thereby stabilizing the relationship between the original pair,
• Faulty problem solving skills,
• Conflict avoidance,
• Inconsistent application of affection or discipline,
• Low levels of support or nurturance or acceptance, and
• Increased degree of expressed hostility towards each other or other family
members.
Check Your Progress Exercise 1
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this Unit.
1. What are the functions of family?
2. What are the characteristics of dysfunctional families?
THE CONCEPT OF FAMILY THERAPY
-
Fa y has long been recognized as a fundamental unit of social organization
in the lives of human beings. The significance of family factors in the maintenance
as well as the treatment of mental disorders has been established by many studies.
The term 'family therapy' was coined by the American Psychiatrist Nathan
Ackerman in the 1950s covers a variety of approaches and is practised by
a variety of professioiials. The key features of family therapy are as follows:
• Family therapy is a branch of sychotherapy that works with families and
couples in intimate relationships; -
• The main feature of family therapy is treatment of more than one family
member in the same therapeutic session;
~.
• Family therapy is a form of psychotherapy that involves all the members
of a nuclear or extended family;
• Marriage and family counselling or therapy is counselling or therapy that
focuses on the well-being of primary relationships and systems;
• In family therapy, the family system as a whole - not just one family
member identified as having the "problem" - is treated;
.'
~
• Family therapy deals with problems involving family structure and family
interaction patterns;
• This approach regards the family, as a whole, as the unit of treatment,
and emphasizes such factors as relationships and communication patterns
rather than traits or symptoms in individual members; and
•
Family therapy is becoming an increasingly common form of treatment as
changes in society are reflected in family structures. It has led to two further
developments that are couples therapy, which treats relationship problems
between marriage partners or gay couples; and the extension of family
therapy to religious communities or other groups that resemble families.
2.4 DIFFERENCE BETWEEN ]
PSYCHOTHERAPY AND COUNSELLING
The term "counselling" and "therapy" are commonly used interchan eabl in
describing what the marriage and family therapist actually does. The term
"Counselling" is used when a strong component of the process is e ucational,
as when parents learn new ways of handling children's behaviours, or when
spouses learn better ways of communicating.
"Counselling" is probably the most appropriate term to describe the process
when the couple or family is basically "healthy" yet seek enrichment of their
quality of life together.
"Therapy" may be more appropriate whent eat deal of emotional
stress or pain in the relationship or system. Professionals often prefer the term
"therapist" to "counsellor" as label, Because it includes education functions as
well as treatment functions.
Blocher (1966) distinguishes between counselling and psychotherapy by pointing
out that the goals of counselling are ordinarily developmental-educativepreventive, and the goals of psychotherapy are generally remediative-adjustivetherapeutic. He describes that five basic assumptions about client and counsellor
differentiate both:
l. Counselling clients are not considered to be "mentally ill", but they are
viewed as being capable of choosing goals, making decisions, and generally
assuming responsibility for their own behaviour and future development.
2. Counselling focuses on present and future.
3. The client is a client, not a patient. The counsellor is not an authority figure
but is essentially a teacher and partner of the client as they move towards
mutually defined goals.
4. The counsellor is not morally neutral but has values, feelings, and standards
of her or his own. Although the counsellor does not necessarily impose
these on clients, yet she or he does not attempt to hide them, and
5. Counsellor focuses on changing behaviour, not just creating insight.
/
Family Therapy: Meaning,
Scope and Applications
33
I ..

Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
Similarities between' Counselling and Psychotherapy
Counselling and psychotherapy are similar in many procedures adopted and
concepts used, Some of them are given below:
• The nature of seating arrangements and directions during the process of
conducting sessions are more or less the same.
• In both therapy and counselling special relationship is built and both value
clients.
• Psychotherapists and counsellors use the same theoretical models.
• Counselling skills are used by those prastising psychotherapy and counselling.
• Both therapy and counselling have same ethical and professional boundaries
like confidentiality, time limits, payments and ethical issues.
,
2.5 HISTORY OF FAMILY THERAPY
Family therapy has several roots. The main roots are as follows:
Child guidance centres: Child guidance centres brought parents into treatment
(began in 1930's) by Nathan Ackerman who is considered as a grandfather
of family therapy.
General systems theory: Biologist Bertalanffy and his study of components
of a self-regulating total system in continuous change seeking a steady state
(during 1940s).
Group therapy: Group therapy used small group processes for therapy (after
World War IT).
Psychoanalysis: Freud acknowledged the role of family relationships in
personality development (after World War IT).
Schizophrenic studies: Bateson's work on double bind interactions (during
19508).
Family therapists emerged in the 1950s and 1960s.
Early psychotherapy approaches focused on individual therapy and the patienttherapist relationship in treating psychological disorders. Although theorists
believed families influenced personality, theories suggested the most important
factors governing human behaviour were internal and subjective. Treatment
therefore focused on neurotic conflicts and destructive interactions in the family
of origin. Patients were treated separately from their families.
Family therapists hypothesised that psychological problems were developed and
maintained in the family context. Personality was viewed as related to reciprocal
interactional patterns with others. Psychological dysfunction was explained in
terms of circular, recursive interpersonal events.
2.6 FAMILY LIFE CYCLE
34
Family life cycle emphasizes how development and change in families follow
certain common patterns, which are shaped by the shifting patterns of internal
and external demands in any given society. Families may at times be faced with
massive demands for change and adaptation. This may be the result of changes
in family composition by the birth of a child, a divorce or remarriage, a death
or perhaps due to changes in autonomy within the family, children becoming
adolescents, a woman going back to work after childrearing, retirement etc.
/
It was argued that the emergence of problems was frequently associated with
these life cycle transitions and their inherent demands and stresses. However,
less was said about the possible positive effect of external inputs, for example,
the arrival of a child possibly uniting a couple or a bereavement drawing family
members closer together.
The external and internal demands for change are continuous but become critical
at transitional points in the family's life.
Family Life Cycle Stages: Transitions
• Independence,
• Coupling or marriage,
• Parenting: Babies through adolescents,
• Launching adult children, and
• Retirement or senior years.
You have read about the- family life cycle stages in detail in Course 1
(MCFf-OOl).
Check Your Progress Exercise 2
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this Unit.
1. What is the difference between psychotherapy and counselling?
2. Write a short note on family life cycle.
2.7 INDICATIONS AND CONTRAINDICATIONS
FOR FAMILY THERAPY
Indications for family therapy:
• Common child psychiatric disorders,
• Child abuse,
• Eating disorders, especially anorexia nervosa,
• Depression,
• Schizophrenia,
• Marital and family distress,
• Families with problems across generational boundaries, and
• Families scapegoating a member or undermining the treatment of a member
in individual therapy.
/
Family Therapy: Meaning,
Scope and Applications
35
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy ,
36
.Some contraindications to family therapy are:
• Members who cannot participate in treatment sessions because of physical
illness or similar limitations;
• Families in which one, or both, of the parents are psychotic;
• Members with very rigid personality structures;
• Families that are unstable or on the verge of breakup; and
• Family violence and sexual abuse.
In the above clinical conditions and situations, the dynamics involved might be
complicated and to assess and get through might be difficult if the family is
resistant or defensive so family therapy may not be viable.
In families where family violence or sexual abuse has occurred, family therapy
is initially contraindicated since the child is unlikely to express feelings in the
presence of the perpetrator, who here is family member. In cases where the
perpetrator is an outside person, presence of both the parents provides support
and encouagement to the child. A multimodal approach is indicated in these
cases with individual or group work for children or parents, and a family
approach used later when rehabilitation of the child and parents is contemplated .
. Families where both the parent suffering from a psychotic disorder might not
be amenable for therapy especially if it is a chronic/unremitting/residual symptom.
Check Your Progress Exercise 3
Note: a) Read the following question carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answer with that provided at the end of this Unit.
1. What are indications for family therapy?
0.& FAMILY THERAPY: AS A PROCESS
Family therapy tends to focus on resolving specific problems. In family therapy
sessions, all members of the family and the therapist(s) are present at most
sessionphe therapists seek to analyze the process of family interaction and
-communication as a whole; they do not take sides with s ecific members. ;They
y m e occasIOnal comments or remarks intended to help family members
become more conscious of patterns or structures that had been previously taken
for granted. Family therapists who work as a team, also model new behaviours
for the family through their interactions with each other during sessions.
~IY 'therapy is based on family systems theory, which understands the family
to be a living organism that is more, than the sum of its individual members.
Family therapy uses "systems" theory to evaluate family members in terms of
/ 1
their position or role within the system as a whole. Problems are treated by \
changing the way the system works rather than trying to "fix" a specific member.
Family systems theory is based on several major concepts or assumptions.
2.9 PREPARATION FOR FAMILY THERAPY
In some instances the family may have been referred to a specialist in family
therapy by their pediatrician or other primary care physician.
Family therapists may be psychiatrists, social workers, clinical psychologists, or
other professionals. They usually evaluate a family for treatment by scheduling
a series of interviews with the members of the immediate family, including young
children, and significant or symptomatic members of the extended family. This
process allows the therapist to find out how each member of the family sees
the problem, as well as to form first impressions of the family's function~in~-,
Family therapists typically look for the level and types of emotions expressed,
patterns of dominance and, submission, the roles played by family members,
communication styles, and the locations of emotional tri hey will also
note whether these patterns are rigid o~ relatively flexible:
Preparation also usually includes drawing a genogram, which is a diagram that
depicts significant persons and events in the family's history. It represents a 7
major tool for assessment of families. It is a visual representation of a family's I
composition, structure, member characteristics, and relationships. Genograms
help in uncovering intergenerational patterns of behaviour, marriage choices, '
family alliances and conflicts, the existence of family secrets, and other information
that sheds light on the family's present situation.
2.10 ASSESSMENT IN FAMILY THERAPY
Family trees or genograms and time lines are useful diagnostic tools in family
therapy. Let us now discuss various techniques for assessment in family therapy.
2.10.1 Family' Tree
A family tree is also known as pedigree or ancestor chart. In this, family
relationships are represented in a tree structure. Generally, the oldest generation
is presented at the top and the youngest generation at the bottom. For example,
if we are making family tree of 5-year old boy, then his grandparents are
presented at top, then his parents and other children of his grand parents, and
then he and his siblings at the bottom.
2.10.2 Time Lines
Time lines can be used to ensure family trees remain useful and uncluttered
and to show changes in oc~upation, location, life course, illness and other.
predictable and unpredictable life events.
Therapists and clients are invited to identify a time in family life that is a snapshot
of family process; this should be at a significant point, for example at the point
ofreferral for professional help; at a life cycle transition point such as leaving
home, death of parent or spouse, etc. The family tree is 'drawn showing, where
.possible, up to three or four generations. Themes to look for and ,explore may
/
Family Therapy: Meaning;
Scope and Applications
37
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
38
include separation, loss, conflict, closeness, communication, power and family
beliefs, myths and legends; explanations and responses to crises and life changes
can be described.
The therapist develops working hypothesis regarding family structure based on
observations of family interactions. Problems are defined in ways that make the
problems amenable to change. Assessment information is gathered from five
areas:
1) The family structure, including its preferred transactional patterns and the
alternative patterns available;
2) The system's flexibility and its capacity for elaboration and restructuring;
3) The family system's resonance, reflecting its sensitivity to individual
member's input. High sensitivity reflects an enmeshed system, low sensitivity
reflects a disengaged system;
4) The family's developmental stage and its performance of the tasks
appropriate to that stage; and
5) The family life context, including the sources of stress and support.
2.10.3 Genogram
The genogram is a map of family process. It can be described as a graphic
representation of families that charts the interactional processes over three
generations. With its lines, boxes, circles and symbols, the genogram records
important facts, life-changing events, and complex relationships of a family
system. These deceptively simple explanations capture the essence of a complex
clinical and consulting instrument that depicts nuances of description and
relationship that may be lost in larger narratives or omitted in an overly intense
focus upon self. The construction of a genogram is an interpersonal event in
which an individual, couple, or family collaborate with a consulting professional
in the gathering, recording and interpreting data about family relationships. Data
are initially drawn from clients' memories as they report and interpret events.
These are recorded with standardized symbols that indicate dates, descriptions
of events, perceived relationships between family members, pertinent information
about deaths, births, addictions, and illnesses, and family secrets known to the
client. Details such as names and ages of all family members, dates of birth,
marriage, divorce, separation and death information about three or more
generations are also included.
Genogram Symbols
•
j
, I
I I
0 Cl 0
~ Fewafe ~ Pet Mljied fClSlfr Pr~~~ Oefbl iwits ~T,"
Gen:ier OWl <Nd
Fig. 2.1 : Standard Gender Symbols for a Genogram
/
Children and Birth Symbols
I
I
I
Cl 0
Biological Adopted Foster Pregnancy Miscarriage Abortion Male Female
Child Child Child Stillbirth Stillbirth
Fig. 2.2: Genogram Symbols for Children's Links and Pregnancy Terminations
2.11 MAJOR FAMILY THERAPY APPROACHES
In this Section we are going to discuss various family therapy approaches which
are commonly used. But before discussing the major family therapy approaches
we would like to see the orientation of these approaches - whether they are
based on client's present life or past life. Table 2.1 depicts the orientation of
major family therapy approaches.
Table 2.1: Present and past oriented models of family therapy approaches
Present oriented Past oriented
•
Strategic •
Psychodynamic
•
Structural • Object Relations
•
Social Constructivist • Multigenerational
•
Cognitive Behavioural • Narrative
•
Experiential
In the above Table 2.1, the family therapy approaches that focus on the present
oriented models of the family or marital therapy focus on the current life situation
of the family or the here and now rather than touching on the dynamics of
the problem and gather some details of the genesis of the problem to be probed
and to some extent interpreted, which is of prime importance in past oriented
family therapy approaches.
2.11.1 Psychodynamic Approach
Many pioneering family therapists were originally psychoanalysts who transferred
their traditional concepts from treatment of individuals to that of the family. In
the psychodynamic model the therapist's task is mainly to interpret, and through
the therapeutic relationship, bring family members' unconscious thoughts, feelings
and experiences into awareness, especially, assisting them to appreciate
associations between past and present. The fundamental goals are insight,
integration and adaptive functioning. For example, a family's current behaviour
may relate to an underlying, continuing conflict stemming from a common
traumatic experience. When the family represses this aspect of their history, they
are helped to see relevant connections. Attention is paid both to members as
individuals with their early attachment patterns and to t he family group \\-ith its
typical modes of functioning.
/
Family Therapy: Meaning,
Scope and Applications
39
I
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
40
2.11.2 Family Systems Perspective
Family systems perspective was originally developed by Von Bertalanffy.
The salient features of family sytems perspective are given below:
• In family systems perspective, individuals are best understood through
assessing the interactions within an entire family.
• Symptoms are viewed as an expression of a dysfunction within a family.
• Problematic behaviours serve a purpose for the family. Problematic
behaviours are a function of the family's inability to operate productively;
and are symptomatic patterns handed down across generations.
• It is believed in family system perspective that a family is an interactional
unit and a change in one member effects all members.
This approach can be reinforced by an array of useful techniques, for example
family 'sculpting', in which physical sculptures are created to map and explore
relationships between members. Similarly, producing a family tree which clarify
not only genealogical patterns but also current ways of relating. These techniques
have the advantage of incorporating children into therapy beyond mere talking.
,
2.11.3 Strategic Therapy
Watzlawick et al. (1967) and Madanes (1981) propagated strategic family
therapy. For a strategic therapist two questions are basic: How is the symptom
helping the family to maintain a balance or overcome a crisis? How can the
symptom be replaced by a more effective solution of the problem?
Brief Strategic Family Therapy (BSFT) is based on three basic principles. These
are discussed below:
1. It is a family systems approach. Family systems means that family members
are interdependent that is, what affects one family member affects other
family members.
2. The patterns of interaction in the family influence the behaviour of each
family member. Patterns of interaction are defined as the sequential
behaviours among family members that become habitual and repeat over
•
time.
3. To plan interventions that carefully target and provide practical ways to
change those patterns of interaction (for example, the way in which mother
and grandmother attempt but fail to establish rules and consequences) those
are directly linked to, say, the adolescent's drug use and other problem
behaviours.
Use of BSFT interventions are strategic in that they are practical, problemfocused, and planned. In this approach, the psychotherapist's emphasis is on
establishing a therapeutic relationship, which includes the importance of joining
with the family, the role of tracking family interactions, and what is involved
in building a treatment plan. Some of the strategies for producing change in
this model include focusing on the present, reframing negativity in the family,
shifting patterns of interaction through reversals of usual behaviour, changing
family boundaries and alliances; "detriangulating" family members caught in the
/
middle of others' conflicts, and opening up closed family systems or subsystems
by directing new interactions.
2.11.4 Structural Family Therapy
In this type of therapy the key work was done by Minuchin (1974) and
Colapinto (1991). The structural therapist believes that change of behaviour is
most important. Therapy begins with the therapist joining with the family. He
or she has the purpose to enhance the feeling of worth of individual family
members. The therapist must attune himself or herself to the family's value systems
and existing hierarchies. After joining, the therapist challenges how things are
done and begins restructuring the family by offering alternative, more functional
ways of behaving. Families are helped to develop communication and social
skills.Action techniques such as enactment of a conflict or emotional entanglement
are applied. The therapist is active and her or his role is more like a director
of a play.
Indications
Structural therapy was initially resorted to in children with psychological problems
linked to marked social stress, such as immigration, poverty and environmental
problems. Children with behaviour problem and psychosomatic states such as
diabetes, asthma and anorexia nervosa are also likely to benefit. The aim here
is to restructure a family whose rigid patterns both trigger and maintain damaging
patterns, even potentially life-threatening states.
2.11.S Experiential Therapy
Experiential therapy was developed by Carl Whitaker. In this approach,
focus is on application of existential therapy to family systems. The therapist
goes into the family therapy session intent on having a growth experience for
himself or herself, knowing that this will stimulate the family to do the same.
Goals:
The main goals of experiential therapy are as follows:
1. Facilitate individual autonomy and a sense of belonging in the family,
2. Help individuals to achieve more intimacy by increasing their awareness
of their inner potential and opening channels for family interaction,
3. Encourage members to be themselves by freely expressing what they are
thinking and feeling, and
4. Support spontaneity, creativity, the ability to play, and the willingness to
be "crazy".
Therapist Function
The major functions played by therapist in experiential therapy are given below:
1. Create family turmoil.
2. Coach family how to get out of the turmoil.
3. Highly involved therapist model: must be transparent, take risks, get involved
with family in the sessions.
4. Help family member experience the here and now by therapist "BEING
WITH" the family.
/
Family Therapy: Meaning,
Scope and Applications
41
1
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
42
5. Three phases: engagement (all powerful), involvement (dominant parent
figure, adviser) & disentanglement (more personal, less involved).
6. Techniques grow out of the therapist's intuitive and spontaneous reactions.
2.11.6 Cognitive Behavioural Therapy for Families
Cognitive behavioural therapy (CBT) for families is brief and solution-focused,
and addresses a wide range of psychological problems. Patterns, especially
around issues of conflict, are examined to identify the roots of the problem,
as well as the goals for the therapy. The work is focused on helping the family
members to think and behave more adaptively, and to learn to make better
choices in efforts to get needs met, so that the family environment is more stable
and peaceful.
Indications for CBT in the family context:
• Eating disorders, addictions,
• Child or adolescent behaviour disorders, and
• Relationship and family problems.
CBT in Children
CBT for children with anxiety disorders may be especially effective when the
family is included in treatment. Family cognitive-behavioural therapy (FCBT)
involves a complex interplay of cognitive-behavioural techniques and family
restructuring, drawing on the combined (and sometimes complementary) resources
and motivations of children and their parents. While child-focused CBT (CCBT)
is quite effective by itself, FCBT can lead to even greater improvements in
anxiety, at least in the short term.
FCBT for children's anxiety disorders draws on effective cognitivebehavioural techniques and supplements these with targeted family interventions.
CBT for children's anxiety disorders consists of two phases: skills training, and
application and practice. During the skills training phase, children are taught
•
techniques for reappraisal of feared situations, relaxation, and self-reward. In
the application and practice phase, a hierarchy is created in which feared
situations are ordered from least to most distressing. Children work their
way up the hierarchy and are rewarded as they attempt increasingly fearful
activities.
Most FCBT programmes have not focused on the specific parenting practices
that are hypothesized to contribute to the development and maintenance of
anxiety in children.
Parents who act intrusively tend to take over tasks that children are (or could
be) doing independently and impose an immature level of functioning on their,
children. Among school aged children, parental intrusiveness can manifest in at
least three domains:
i) Unnecessary assistance with children's daily routines (e.g., dressing),
/
ii) Infantilizing behaviour (for example using baby words, excessive physical
affection), and invasions of privacy (for example, parents opening doors
without knocking).
Parents who act intrusively are posited to interfere with the process of habituation
(fear reduction) by preventing children from actually confronting feared but benign
stimuli. Conversely, parents who .grant appropriate levels of autonomy may
enhance children's feelings of mastery and self-efficacy and thus contribute to
the regulation of anxiety.
The building confidence of FCBT programme includes individual sessions with
the child and complementary parent-training sessions. These sessions emphasize
on the following:
• Giving choices when children are indecisive (rather than making choices
for them),
• Allowing children to struggle and learn by trial and error rather than taking
over tasks for them,
• Labeling and accepting children's emotional responses (rather than criticizing
them), and
• Promoting children's acquisition of novel self-help skills.
An incentive system is also taught to parents to encourage their children's
courageous behaviour. A typical FCBT session begins with a 20-minute individual
meeting with the child to conduct skills training or application/practice. Skills
are reviewed less thoroughly with the child than in child-focused CBT (CCBT),
permitting time for parent-training (20 minutes) and conjoint parent-child meetings
(10 minutes). These can be resorted to in cases of children with separation
anxiety, but the issues it raises are also applicable to other types of anxiety
disorders such as social phobia, and generalized anxiety disorder.
CBT in Family Functioning
The ability of families to resolve conflict and tension depends in part on their
communication skills, but also on the ingrained beliefs of family members about
individual and family functioning, or what cognitive behavioural therapists refer
to as schemas. Schemas, along with emotion and behaviour, are a significant
part of what constitutes the fabric of the family's functioning. In essence, schemas
are used as a template for an individual's life experiences and how she or he
processes information.
Consistent and compatible with systems theory, the cognitive-behavioural
approach to families is based on the premise that members of a family
simultaneously influence and are influenced by each other's thoughts, emotions
and behaviours. In essence, to know the entire family system is to know the
individual parts and the ways in which they interact. As each family member
observes her or his own cognitions, behaviours, and emotions regarding family
interaction, as well as cues regarding the responses of other family members,
these perceptions lead to the formation of assumptions about family dynamics,
which then develop into relatively stable schemas or "cognitive structures." These
cognitions, emotions, and behaviours may elicit responses from some members
/
Family Therapy: Meaning,
Scope and Applications
43
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
44
that constitute much of the moment-to-moment interaction with other family
members. This interplay stems from the more stable schemas that serve as the
foundation for the family's functioning. When this cycle involves negative content
that affects cognitive, emotional, and behaviour responses, the volatility of the
family's dynamics tends to escalate, rendering family members vulnerable to a
negative spiral of conflict. As the number of family members increases, so does
the complexity of the dynamics, adding more fuel and intensity to the escalation
process.
Parents' family schemas are often disseminated and applied in the rearing of
their children. The family schema is subject to change as major events occur
during the course of family life (for example death, divorce or illness), and they
also continue to evolve over the course of ordinary day-to-day experience.
Children may also rebuke parents' beliefs, and take an opposite stance; for
example, "I am not going to give into how she thinks I should act - I will
do what I want."
A central goal of CBFf is to facilitate as much change as possible, given the
influence that schemas have on family dysfunction. Intervention consists of a
series of cognitive and behavioural strategies used in restructuring the basic or
core beliefs of the family and altering or modifying behaviour patterns that are
associated with the schema.
The behaviour component of CBFf focuses on several aspects of family
members' actions, including:
a) Excess negative interaction and deficits in pleasing behaviours exchanged
by family members,
b) Expressive and listening skills used in communication,
c) 'Problem-solving skills, and
d) Negotiation and behaviour change.
The theoretical models underlying behavioural approaches to family therapy are
social learning theory (for example, Bandura, 1977) and social exchange theory
(for example; Thibaut & Kelly, 1959).
In the cognitive-behavioural approach, the therapist assists family members in
identifying how emotions commonly are linked with specific cognitions and help
family members explore the appropriateness and validity of cognitions that are
associated with negative emotions .
.
Intervening in Family Schemas
In addressing family schemas from a cognitive behavioural perspective, it is
important to follow a series of steps that can facilitate the process of schema
analysis and lay the foundation for restructuring:
Step 1: Uncover and identify shared family schemas and highlight those areas
of conflict and dysfunction that are fueled by the schemas.
Step 2: Trace the origin of family schemas and how they have evolved to
become an ingrained mechanism in the family process. This is done by probing
/
into the parents' background and the parenting styles that their parents used
during their upbringing.
Step 3: Point out the need for change, indicating how the restructuring of
a schema may facilitate more adaptive functioning and harmonious family
interaction. At this stage, it is essential to point out to the family that
modification of schemas may ease the tension and lower the level of conflict
in the family.
Step 4: Elicit acknowledgment and encourage cooperation from the family as
a whole for a need to change or modify existing dysfunctional schemas. This
is imperative for change to actually occur, and it paves the way for a
collaborative effort between the.therapist and the family members. For family
members who have different or incompatible goals for treatment, finding a
common ground between family members becomes a major objective for the
therapist. Using newly gathered information may help in the modification of
goals.
Step 5: Assess the family's ability to make changes and plan strategies for
facilitating them. It is important to determine how capable a family is of making
significant changes in their basic beliefs. Potential limiting factors include limited
ability levels and resistance to acquiring effective coping skills.
Step 6: Implement the change. The family's therapist functions as an instrument
to facilitate change, encouraging family members to consider modified versions
of their basic beliefs. This is done through the use of collaborative experiences
(such as is referred to in Step 5), brainstorming ideas for modifying beliefs,
and weighing the effects that modifications to existing beliefs are likely to have
on family interactions. The key in the change process is identifying how family
members actually will behave differently toward each other if they are living
according to the modified schema. For example, if the family is attempting
to adopt a new belief, (for example, "It is important to be tactful in expressing
negative feelings to other family members, but family members should have
the freedom to share such feelings with each other"), the therapist helps them
to identify how they will carry out this belief at the behaviour level.
Step 7: Enacting new behaviours. This involves trying out the changes and
feeling the fit. The use of family exercises and homework assignments is
imperative in enacting permanent change.
Step 8: Solidifying the changes. This stage involves establishing the changed
schema and associated family behaviours as a permanent pattern in the family
through repeated practice, while family members also remain flexible with regard
to future modifications.
2.11.7 Narrative Family Therapy
The followers of the narrative approach consider that experience rooted in
the life events is elaborated in the form of a story, which gives to these events
a meaning reflecting the systems of belief. In the therapy process, the "life
story" of a family is connected with the internal and external culture of the
family. Change is enabled by retelling the story, in the course of which meanings
attributed to the events, can change or alternate.
Family Therapy: Meaning,
Scope and Applications
45

Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
46
2.11.8 Multigenerational Family Therapy
The therapy was developed by Murray Bowen. The salient features of
multigenerational family therapy are as follows:
• The application of rational thinking to emotionally saturated systems.
• A well-articulated theory is considered to be essential.
• It postulates that with the proper knowledge the individual can change.
• Change occurs only with other family members.
• Triangulation - A pattern of interaction with two-against-one family member
is experienced. A third party is recruited to reduce anxiety and stabilize
a couple's relationship.
• Make the most use of genograms.
• Differentiation of the self - A psychological separation from others is done.
• Involves psychological separation of intellect and emotions, and independence
of the self from others.
• The greater one's differentiation, the better one's ability to keep from being
drawn into dysfunctional patterns with other family members.
Multigenerational family therapy attends to the following goals:
1. To change the individuals within the context of the system;
2. To end generation-to-generation transmission of problems by resolving
emotional attachments;
3. To lessen anxiety and relieve symptoms; and
4. To increase the individual member's level of differentiation.
2.11.9 Object Relations
Object relations consititute a psychodynamic approach to understanding human
behaviour, development, relationships, psychopathology and psychotherapy.
Many clinicians shy away from object relations because they believe it to be
overly complex. Indeed, it is complex in its details and some of its theorists
like Otto Kernberg explore these details.
However, there is also a straightforward perspective of object relations that is
easily comprehended and helpful in understanding relationships. In fact, after
clinicians understand object relation, they find that it intuitively reflects certain
truths about all human relationships, from the early relationships of infancy, to
friendships, to marriage, to the therapeutic relationship. Even students who are
new to object relations quickly realize this.
The family therapist has the purpose to enhance the feeling of worth of individual
family members.
2.11.10 Eclectic Approach
Many practitioners now take an eclectic approach by using various approaches
including cognitive-behavioural therapy and psychodynamic therapy, for example.
Therapists often work with their clients to create a treatment plan that
encompasses different techniques and orientations.
/
Check Your Progress Exercise 4
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this Unit.
1. List the major approaches for family therapy.
2. What are the salient features of multigenerational family therapy?
3. Match the columns:
i) Multigenerational family therapy a) Carl Whitaker
ii) Experiential therapy b) Von Bestalanffy
iii) Family systems perspective c) Bowen
2.12 BASIC TECHNIQUES IN MARITAL AND
FAMILY THERAPY
Structural, strategic and transgenerational family therapists at times may seem
to be operating alike, using similar interventions with family. Differences might
become clear when the therapist explains a certain technique or intervention.
Most of the current practicing family therapists go far beyond the limited number
of techniques usually associated with a single theory.
There are multiple techniques used in family and marital therapies. These
techniques have been derived from various schools of thought and approaches
to family therapy. Each therapist follows her or his own approach depending
on the training they have received, experience gained or whatever they are
confident and comfortable in.
The following are some techniques that have been used in working with couples
and families to stimulate change or gain more information about the family system.
Each technique described here should be applied carefully. It cannot be viewed
as a cure, but as a method to help mobilize the family. The when, where, and
how of each intervention always rests with the therapist's professional judgement,
experience and skills.
/
Family Therapy: Meaning,
Scope and Applications
47

Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
48
2.12.1 The Genogram
Genogram is a pictorial depiction of a family through three or more generations.
Often called a family tree, it records relevant and important information about
a family. Genograms capture family history by noting relationships, births, losses,
connections, patterns, roles, occupations, alignments, communication patterns,
health history and supports. Some genograms also include information on
disorders running in the family such as alcoholism, depression, diseases, alliances,
and living situations. Genograms can vary significantly because there is no
limitation as to what type of data can be included. Genogram is the basic tool
of assessment in family therapy where the therapist starts the session by drawing
a genogram interviewing the significant family members seeking therapy where
therapists gain a rich knowledge of the family history of their clients. By involving
a family in the genogram drawing process, they may feel more comfortable talking
about certain relationships, losses, or histories. The genogram also opens up
a natural means for the therapist or case manager to gather information for the
life planning process. Genograms allow a therapist and her or his client to quickly
identify and understand various patterns in the client's family history which may
have had an influence on the client's current state of mind.
Genograms were first developed and popularized in clinical settings by Monica
McGoldrick and Randy Gerson. Genogram is created with simple symbols
representing the gender, with various lines to illustrate family relationships. Some
genogram users also put circles around members who live in the same living
spaces. Genograms can be prepared by using a complex word processor, or
a computer drawing program. A genogram will help family therapists to make
an appropriate assessment of the relationship patterns and where intervention
may be needed to assist the family reduce their dysfunction and/or problematic
situation that brought them into therapy.
2.12.2 The Family Floor Plan
The family floor plan technique is used as a diagnostic tool in early phase of
therapy (Coppersmith, 1980). Here, usually the parents may be asked to draw
the family floor plan for their family of origin. The basic premise is to gather
significant and relevant information across generations which is obtained in a
non-threatening mode. In the process of drawing a floor plan points of discussion
bring out meaningful issues related to one's past.
There is another adaptation to this technique where family members draw the
floor plan for their nuclear family. The importance of space and territory is often
inferred as a result of the family floor plan. Other components of assessment
include looking at the levels of comfort between family members, space
accommodations, and rules are often revealed. Indications of differentiation,
operating family triangles, and subsystems often become evident.
2.12.3 Reframing
Reframing is an important art and skill associated with many therapeutic
approaches whereby alternative and equally plausible explanations for the
symptomatic or complained about behaviour are offered to clients in order to
introduce a difference in communication patterns and open up possibilities for
more choices for clients. For example, a teenager father can be blamed for
impregnating a girl or praised for his potency; an anorexic girl can be relabeled
/
as stubborn and determined not sick. A classic example of the opportunities
offered by reframing is Langbridge's adage, 'Two men look out through the
same bars: one sees the mud, and one the stars'. Similarly, the optimist says
of a cup, it is half full, while the pessimist says it is half empty. The ability
to reframe or develop new and different and acceptable meanings or perspectives
for and with clients is what enables therapists to create a context for change
and work with clients towards developing an understanding of the underlying
meaning of their problem.
2.12.4 Tracking
Most family and marital therapists use tracking at some stage or other. Through
this strategy the counsellor learns how the family interacts and then uses this
information to establish a therapeutic plan of action. Tracking is a technique
in which the counsellor respects how the family interacts but, at the same time,
takes advantage of those family interactions for therapeutic purposes. Structural
family therapists (Minuchin & Fishman, 1981) see tracking as an essential part
of the therapist's joining process with the family. During the tracking process,
the therapist listens intently to family stories, carefully records events, and their
sequence. Through tracking, the family therapist is able to identify the sequence
of events operating in a system to keep it the way it is. What happens between
point A and point B or C to create D can be helpful while designing interventions.
In tracking, the therapist uses clarification, amplification, and approval of family
communication to reinforce individuals and subsystems.
2.12.5 Joining
A number of techniques can be used to establish a therapeutic relationship. Some
of these techniques fall into the category of "joining", or becoming a temporary
member of the family. Joining has two aspects; these are: (i) it is the step a
counsellor takes to prepare the family for change, and (ii) it also occurs when
a therapist gains a position of leadership within the family. Counsellors use several
techniques to prepare the family to accept therapy and to accept the therapist
as a leader of change. Engagement or joining begins from the very first contact
with the family. Some techniques that the therapist can use to facilitate the family's
readiness for therapy include presenting oneself as an ally, appealing to family
members with the greatest dominance over the family unit, and attempting to
fit in with the family by adopting the family's manner of speaking and behaving.
A counsellor has joined a family when she or he has been accepted as a "special
temporary member" of the family for the purpose of treatment. Joining occurs
when the therapist has gained the family's trust and has blended with family
members. To prepare the family for change and earn a position of leadership,
the counsellor must show respect and support for each family member and,
in turn, win each one's trust. Specific techniques that can be used to join the
family, include the following:
1. Maintenance (for example, supporting the family's structure and entering
the system by accepting their rules that regulate behaviour);
2. Tracking [for example, using what the family talks about (content) andhow
their interactions unfold (process) to enter the family system]; and
2. Mimesis (for example, matching the tempo, mood, and style of family
member interactions).
/Family Therapy: Meaning,
Scope and Applications
49
-I
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
50
2.12.6 Family Sculpting
Family sculpting is a technique dcve 0
Dahl and used extensively by Virginia
others whereby a physical arrangem
a family member or by a therapist) SYl
thinks and feels relationships are, ha It
sculpt director would like relation; >s
The process of sculpting can be usec
communication patterns and/or as an u
Sculpting is thus a tool enabling famil v J
and future relationships like how rel '
family members or therapists would 1 •
the psychological distances and the fee 1
is a useful and powerful tool which car )
to the needs of the therapeutic proc
training therapists, It can be undertak
with the therapist - or the therapist 11"
the family situation as described by •
A family member or therapist is invi >
to sculpt the family (to make a living "')
symptoms emerge or at a future time w
are asked to remain silent, to nor' ce
sculpt. Family members are then invite
about the positions they have been a'!o t
sculpt has had the opportunity to say how "
then invites everyone to move to a 1
comfortable in relation to other fanul',
person being invited to comment or c: c
make to become and remain more cor I J
with themselves and in their relations
£1" l Kantor, Fred and Bunny
\ 'app, Maurizio Andolfi and
.nbers is made (either by
cting how the, sculpt director
( v. at a given time, the family
It> family,
, t t' relationships or change
cure family relationships.
t comment on past, present
perienced, what changes
and to get in touch with
11 ' ions they arouse. Sculpting
1I" -d -n a number of ways according
, i'J both in therapy and in
I I Is only or in collaboration
f> ' -lpt how they experience
., OlS negotiates permission)
n, ationships) at a time when
" have disappeared, People
they are arranged in the
r} I n what feelings they have
en. 'When everyone in the
" reel, the director of the sculpt
• uld prefer and find more
he exercise ends with each
and others would have to
)' physically and emotionally
I t -ier people in the sculpt.
2.12.7 Building Communica s
<il iieve a sense of cohesion
expression of ideas and
, p ion of ideas expressed by
\ 'I-ar and congruent messages,
t ar d effective problem solving
a nily members to share their
to cohesion and adaptability.
uent and disqualifying messages,
1, poor problem-solving skills,
11 m; nizes the ability of family
) ment on the dimensions. Open
. (p freedom and free-flowing
J ~notional, as well as lack of
l ' ized by hesitancy to share and
I " i11sare crucial to satisfaction
raining can result in improved
Families that communicate well with ..
and adaptability. Communication is (
feelings assertively but inoffensi vely, cl
others attentively and accurately (Robn
empathy, reflective listening, supportive
characterize positive communication. 1
changing needs and preferences as they
Negative communication includessending lI'L n<
lack of empathy, nonsupportive messag
and paradoxical and double-binding m
members to share feelings, thereby restr ~+j 1
communication is characterized by an 'v
exchange of information, both factual
constraints. Problem communication 1 (~
negative styles of interaction. Good COlT t t
with family relationships. Communicati )J1 ,k I
family relationships.
I
Faulty communication methods and systems become evident within one or two
family sessions. A number of techniques can be implemented to focus directly
on communication skills building between couples or between family members.
Listening techniques including restatement of content, reflection of feelings, taking
turns, expressing feelings, and nonjudgemental brainstorming are utilized in
communication skill building.
Some of these methods include reflecting, repeating and fair fighting.
Reflecting involves having a member express her or his feelings and concerns,
then having another member reflect back what she or he heard that person
say.
Repeating techniques involve having a member state how she or he feels, while
another member repeats back what was said. Repeating and reflecting techniques
allow members to better understand why they feel as they do.
Fair fighting techniques focus on attentive listening, and expressing feelings and
concerns in a nonthreatening manner.
2.12.8 Strategic Tasks
Strategic tasks can be seen to fall broadly into two categories depending on
whether family members are likely to carry out instructions offered or ~ill fail
or refuse to do so: directive tasks - that means asking families to do something
that the therapist hopes will alter problematic sequences of interactions - and
paradoxical tasks where they are asked to do the opposite of what the therapist
intends to happen.
2.12.9 Restructuring
The following techniques challenge and unbalance the family system, creating
movement that forces the family to seek alternative transactions and solutions.
1) Enactment: The therapist has family members perform an interaction that
may be relatively innocuous or directly related to the presenting problem.
Enactments are utilized to diagnose family structure, increase intensity and
restructure family systems.
2) Reenactment: The family is asked to re-create a situation that has already
occurred. These re-creations are performed in the tHerapy session, and
the therapist helps to explicate and create a successful outcome to a normally
troublesome interactional problem.
3) Actualizing family transactional patterns: By directing the family to have
a conversation or by refusing to answer a question, the therapist stimulates
naturalistic family interactions so she or he can observe typical transactions.
4) Marking boundaries: The therapist assists the family in setting new
boundary rules, renegotiating old rules, or establishing specific functions for
each subsystem to strengthen diffuse boundaries or increase the permeability
of rigid boundaries, thereby increasing healthy subsystem interaction.
5) Escalating stress: The therapist heightens tension in a family to force the
family members to accept restructuring. The therapist does this by
encouraging conflict when it occurs, joining alliances against other family
members, and blocking dysfunctional transactional patterns that serve to
decrease stress for the system.
Family Therapy: Meaning,
Scope and Applications
51
1
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
52
6) Assigningtasks: The therapist assigns specific tasks for individual family
members or subsystems to accomplish in the session or at home.
7) Utilizing symptoms: By encouraging, de-emphasizing, or relabeling a
symptom, the therapist alters the function the symptom serves in the family
system.
8) Paradoxical injunction: The therapist imposes a directive that places the
client in a therapeutic double bind that promotes change regardless of the
client's compliance with the directive. This technique typically is utilized when
resistance to the directive is anticipated.
9) Manipulating mood in the family: The therapist attempts to change the
mood or pacing of the family in the session. If the family appears to be
lethargic or depressed, the therapist may introduce action techniques to
bring more energy into the situation.
10) Support, educationand guidance:The therapist provides direct instruction
to teach the family to behave differently.
2.12.10 Circular Questioning
The major tool of Milan and post-Milan systemic therapists is the process of
asking circular questions.
• In family systems, each family member's behaviour is caused by and causes
the other family members' behaviours. They are each impacting the other,
in a circular manner.
• Questions are seen as a source of information, suggestion, validation,
introducing new perspectives, perturbation, and as an initiator of search
process for patients.
Questions relate to the following areas:
1. What is the symptom that the patient presents? What is it there for? What
function might it serve?
•
2. What is the context of the symptom, that is, what is happening when the
symptom occurs?
3. Why now? Why this symptom? (the physical, psychological or social
reasons for the presence of the symptom).
4. When is the symptom present? When did it start? When is it worse, when
better?
5. Who has the symptom/problem?
6. Who is around when the symptom happens? Who can make it better, who
makes it worse?
7. Who is affected by the symptom and in what way? How does the symptom
affect the family and how does the family (and others) affect the symptom?
/
Check Your Progress Exercise 5
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this Unit.
1. What are the techniques used in family therapy?
2. Write a short note on restructuring?
2.13 RESISTANCE IN FAMILY THERAPY
Resistance can be understood in the same way as any other pattern of family
interaction. The term "resistance" refers to the maladaptive interactive patterns
that keep families from entering treatment. From a family-systems perspective,
resistance is nothing more than the family's display of its inability to adapt
effectively to the situation at hand and to collaborate with one another to seek
help. If the counsellor wants the family to be in counselling or psychotherapy,
she or he will have to recognize that the client (or a noncooperative parent
figure) is the most powerful person in the family. Once the reason the family
is not in treatment is understood, the counsellor or psychotherapist can draw
upon the concept of tracking to find a way to reach this powerful person directly
and negotiate a treatment contract to which the person will agree. Thus, the
key to eliminating the resistance to family therapy lies within the family's patterns
of interaction; overcome the resistance in the interactional patterns and the family
will come to counselling or family therapy.
Multicultural counselling or psychotherapy literature strongly supports the idea
that counsellors/psychotherapists need to be aware of their own biases, values,
stereotypical beliefs, and assumptions in order to appropriately serve culturally
diverse clients.
2.14 ETHICAL ISSUES IN FAMILY THERAPY
Mental health associations have developed standardized codes of ethics in order
to govern the professional application of qualified therapists. These ethics are
the basic framework that defines professional therapy, and are in no way the
same as values. Values are much different than ethics in that ethics define the
framework of professional therapy, while values predict the motivation and
mechanisms of therapy.
/
"'"Family Therapy: Meaning,
Scope and Applications
53
1
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
54
There are different approaches to ethical issues in counselling and family therapy.
They deal with values, principles and personal moral activities. A brief description
of these is given below:
The fundamental values of counselling and family therapy include a
commitment to:
• Respecting human rights and dignity,
• Ensuring the integrity of therapist-client relationships,
• Enhancing the quality of professional knowledge and its application,
• Alleviating personal distress and suffering,
• . Fostering a sense of self that is meaningful to the person(s) concerned,
• Increasing personal effectiveness,
• Enhancing the quality of relationships between people,
• Appreciating the variety of human experience and culture, and
• Striving for the fair and adequate provision of counselling and family therapy
services irrespective of all considerations.
Values Inform Principles
They represent an important way of expressing a general ethical commitment
that becomes more precisely defined and action-orientated when expressed as
a principle.
• Fidelity: It means honouring the trust placed in the practitioner,
• Autonomy: It means respect for the client's right to be self-governing,
• Beneficence: It means a commitment to promoting the client's well-being,
• Non-maleficence: It means a commitment to avoiding harm to the client,
• Justice: It is providing fair and impartial treatment of all clients and the
provision of adequate services, and 10.
• Self-respect: It means fostering the practitioner's self-knowledge and care
for self.
1
Personal Moral Qualities
Personal qualities to which counsellors and family therapists are strongly
encouraged to aspire include:
• Empathy: Empathy is the ability to communicate understanding of another
person's experience from that person's perspective.
• Warmth: Warmth is also called "unconditional positive regard." It involves
accepting and caring about the client as a person, regardless of any
evaluation of her or his behaviours or thoughts. It is most often communicated
through our non-verbal behaviour.
• Congruence: Congruence (or genuineness) is being honest and authentic
in our dealings with our clients. The minimum it requires is that therapist
only works with clients for whom she or he can have real empathy, warmth
and respect, rather than role-playing or "techniquing" those qualities.
/
• Sincerity: Sincerity is a personal commitment to consistency between what
is professed and what is done.
• Integrity: Integrity is commitment to being moral in dealings with others,
personal straightforwardness, honesty and coherence.
• Resilience: Resilience is the capacity to work with the client's concerns
without being personally diminished.
• Respect: Respect is showing appropriate esteem to others and their
understanding of themselves.
• Humility: Humility is the ability to assess accurately and acknowledge one's
own strengths and weaknesses.
• Competence: Competence is the effective deployment of the skills and
knowledge needed to do what is required.
• Fairness: Fairness is the consistent application of appropriate criteria to
inform decisions and actions.
• Wisdom: Wisdom is possession of sound judgement that informs practice.
• Courage: Courage is the capacity to act inspite of known fears, risks and
uncertainty.
Other Ethical Issues
Informed Consent in the Counselling Relationship
Informed consent means clients have the freedom to choose whether to enter
into or remain in a counselling relationship and addresses their need to have
adequate information about the counselling process and the counsellor. Counsellors
have an obligation to review in writing and verbally with clients the rights and
responsibilities of both the counsellor and the client. Informed consent is an
ongoing part of the counselling process, and counsellors appropriately document
discussions of informed consent throughout the counselling relationship.
Confidentiality, Privileged Communication and Privacy
Confidentiality plays a major role in defining the communication between a
counsellor and a client, bearing in mind that trust is one of.the backbones of
a therapeutic relationship. Other major issues such as consultancy with
supervisors or colleagues; definition of the type of confidentiality to be used
(absolute or relative) prior to the counselling relationship; and session recordkeeping, must be considered by therapists when practicing professional counselling.
Complying with ethical guidelines is one of the most important aspects of being
professional counsellors or therapists.
At initiation and throughout the family therapy or counselling process, therapists
or counsellors inform clients of the limitations of confidentiality and seek to identify
foreseeable situations in which confidentiality must be breached.
In couples and family counselling, therapists or counsellors clearly define who
is considered "the client" and discuss expectations and limitations of confidentiality.
Counsellors seek agreement and document in writing such agreement among
all involved parties having capacity to give consent concerning each individual's
right to confidentiality and any obligation to preserve the confidentiality of
information known.
/
Family Therapy: Meaning,
Scope and Applications
55
I
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
56
Check Your Progress Exercise 6
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this Unit.
1. . Defme resistance.
,
.............................................................................................................
2. What are the essential personal moral ethics?
2.15 COUNSELLING CASE STUDIES
The five real-life case studies are presented in this Section for a better
understanding by the students of the problems and situations encountered by
the clients and their close relatives which warrant some intervention through either
individual counselling or psychotherapy, family counselling or family therapy.
Names and places in the case studies used have been changed to protect client
pnvacy.
CASE 1
Relationship Difficulties
Ravi and Megha agreed to come to counselling together in order to
sort out the differences in their marriage as early as possible. In their
own words, they said 'we no 'longer get on well in anything'. There
was no longer any communication, they snapped at each other, usually
bordering on rudeness and sarcasm. Megha said that Ravi in no way
fulfilled her emotional needs (to be loved, appreciated and cared
for). Ravi acknowledged that he was working longer and longer hours
in order to avoid going home. He said he was feeling empty and
in distress. He said he could not respond to Megha with words of
love as he would feel ingenuine if he did. Both said. they felt
"finished".
In counselling, each was asked why they had agreed to come. Ravi
said he didn't really want to leave Megha; that he loved her and
hoped to restore some of the old feeling of before. Megha was amazed
to hear this, and also said she didn't want to separate on account
of the children who were 6 and 4 years old, as she herself had come
from a disturbed home, and knew the pain involved of having
separated parents. She said she was prepared to stay on in the
relationship even if Ravi didn't fulfill her needs.
/
Assessment:
A few sessions were devoted for evaluation which reflected the dynamics of
the underlying problem. It became evident that this couple had a combination
of poor communication and past hurts that had not been resolved, and were
certainly heading for separation if this matter was not addressed quickly. The
counsellor suggested to them that if they could improve the communication,
and in doing so, unearth and safely talk about some old hurts, there was
a chance that they might reconnect emotionally.
Work done in counselling:
• Ventilation: Both Ravi and Megha had the chance to tell their side of
the story without interruption, with a focus on the recent past. Megha
chose to have one session on her own in order to really "get things
off her chest". Ravi agreed this was appropriate, and Megha found the
chance to ventilate and cry, which was very therapeutic.
• Communication: Counsellor taught them a model of communication
where one had the opportunity to honestly level with the other about
the feelings harbored about a certain issue, past or present. The other
had to listen and acknowledge the feelings, before continuing with the
interaction. Due to 'the model, feelings could be communicated safely,
without sarcasm or defensive responses.
• Past hurts: If not ventilated, past unresolved hurts remain and trigger
anger. In and out of session, Ravi and Megha gave each other permission
to raise past hurts, and talk about them using the communication rules.
Outcome:
At the commencement of their third session, Ravi and Megha, who were
noticeably more relaxed and interacting with affection, said, "Thank you,
you have saved our marriage". Ravi said he was feeling "lighter", Megha
commented that even friends were remarking how" connected" they seemed
to be. Within three months of starting counselling, this couple was able to
survive the stress of having in-laws from their village staying in the house for
3 weeks, and was thrilled by this achievement together!
CASE 2
Foreign assignment & relocation to another country and culture
Anjali, early 30's, married, no children, was referred to a counselling
centre by her doctor because of stress and trouble settling in Paris. She
said that she felt "unbelievably depressed" and had general anxiety that
seemed to be bogging her. She and her husband had been in Paris for
6 weeks, their first overseas assignment. Both had moved to Paris
willingly and with the usual amount of nervous excitement (perhaps more
than usual as there had only been 2 months notice that the move was
actually happening!).
Since arriving, Anjali had made good attempts to settle in by joining
a support network for women, attending parties with Vivek her husband
/
Family Therapy: Meaning,
Scope and Applications
57
-I
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
58
and getting involved in occasional voluntary work. She had left behind
a satisfying career as software engineer, and hoped to find work in Paris
once she had settled .
.Assessment:
Anjali reported that she knew nobody apart from her husband with whom
she could reveal her feelings - at this stage, people were acquaintances,
not friends. Her husband seemed not to understand - he was at work all
day, building up his work credibility and social contacts. Anjali felt she spent
hours alone and yearned for his companionship, yet when she would tell
him her feelings, with the hope of having her feelings validated, she found
that instead, he would become frustrated with her.
This reinforced the guilt she already felt. After all, other women would envy
her situation - not having to work, living in an exotic place, no financial
worries. So what was wrong with her? Why did she feel so sad? She found
that she really missed her work, her financial independence, her day-to-day
work routine, friends and missed Sunday visits at her mum's place, which
had been a family tradition for years.
With prompting, Anjali could also identify loss at not being able to attend
her regular dance class, also loss of the old feelings of being a worthwhile
person. The latter had been compounded by the fact that Anjali had sent
out many CV'sto potential employers in Paris, and to that date had not
had a single response.
Work done in counselling
The counsellor validated Anjali's feelings, and labeled the experience she was
going through as relocation trauma. This is a situation where, following a
move, a person can feel grief at the loss of all the familiar things at home,
and experience completely new feelings in a new environment. Due to the
fact that many of the emotional and physical responses are unfamiliar, a person
can feel out of control or even fearful that her or his life.may go out of
control and crazy.
Through some sessions with Mrs. Anjali, the counsellor was able to provide
her with a strategy of refrarning to enable her to continue functioning in spite
of her feelings. Refrarning involves looking at the problems being faced from
a slightly different perspective, in order to consider new options for solving
them. This gives rise to hope, that different actions will bring about a solution.
It provided reassurance that in time, by utilizing the suggested strategy, she
would regain a feeling of being in control. The counsellor also provided
information about resources for social and professional networking.
Outcome
Anjali returned for one more counselling session several weeks later. She
had been for four job interviews in the meantime and had received one job
offer. She felt a return of control as she considered the choice of whether
to accept the job offer. She was back to her "normal self" - able to manage
the stresses in her life and feeling more settled in 'the country she wanted
to run away from a few months ago'.
/
==
CASE 3
Marital problems in the couple reflected in child's pathology
Mrs. Deepa & Mr. Raju,a couple in their thirties was referred from a
psychiatrist to the marital therapist with complaints of incompatibility
between them. They were married for the last 8 years and it was an
arranged marriage and the husband hailed from an upper class family.
Mr. Raju was the only son his parents and had a younger sister who
was married and settled elsewhere and visiting this family on special
occasions and festivals. Deepa's parent in-laws all stayed together. The
relationship between the daughter-in-law and parents-in-law was also
disturbed. The mother-in-law was described as belligerent and had high
expectations of Deepa; this was an issue which caused more problems
between the couple. Despite a band of servants at their beck and call,
there was always a complaint about the house-keeping and cooking; that
due to callousness and bad supervision it was not attended to properly.
Mrs. Deepa, was always in tears that despite her efforts to please her
mom-in-law felt it was impossible.
Assessment:
Subsequent sessions with the couple and independent sessions revealed that
the spouse was a perfectionist and found fault in everything the wife did.
He was never appreciative of any of her efforts to come to their expectations.
It was evident during the conjoint sessions that he was impatient, poor listener
and tried to enforce his views on her much to her displeasure which she
resented. It also became known that his parents had a poor quality of marriage
and till date there were a lot of disagreements between them. Mr. Raju her
husband felt that should not be repeated in his life but he could never try
to stop being dominating and that Ms. Deepa has failed in everything from
being an effective homemaker, an obedient daughter-in-law, responsible mother
for their son and a loving partner for him. The couple later also reported
that the situation had affected their only son, 6 year old, who had some
problems which none of them could decipher. The grand child was construed
as 'a normal kid' by the grandparents and Mr. Ravi concurred with his parents
observations. However the mother who was a graduate felt that 'things were
•
not O.K.' with her kid. On further enquiry it was found that the child had
history of incessant crying, clumsiness - would drop things, spill while eating
and so on. He always was on the move, restless, and highly distractible with
poor attention span. There were symptoms suggestive of an Attention Deficit
Hyperactivity Disorder (ADHD).
Work done in counselling
• Ventilation: Both Raju and Deepa were allowed to narrate their side
of the story without interruption, with a focus on the recent past. Deepa
chose to have several independent sessions "to unburden her heart" as
she was quite frustrated, angry and distressed too. During sessions usually
she was tearful and hence was encouraged to be free and not withhold
expressing her emotions. At the end of such sessions she usually felt
better. Ravi agreed this was appropriate, and Megha found the chance
to ventilate and cry, which was very therapeutic.
/
Family Therapy: Meaning,
Scope and Applications
59
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
60
• Communication: Training in effective communication is an important
tenet in family and marital therapy. In this couple it was observed that
each partner was talking at the same time oblivious to who was listening
to them. They were talking at an increased volume, not taking turns,
criticizing, each one blaming the other for what had happened. The couple
was educated about healthy communication styles. The need for a direct,
dear, two-way communication was emphasized, as was the importance
of taking turns in an interaction. Criticizing and belittling, bringing past
issues and blaming were discouraged. The couple was encouraged to
look at the positive aspects or the strengths of each-other and to give
positive strokes or reinforcements to each other. It was noted that as
a family they had no activities together, of late had discontinued the family
rituals of eating together, going out or other celebrations due to ongoing
misunderstanding. Mrs. Deepa also had stopped talking to her motherin-law. These issues were addressed and the couple agreed to comply
with the therapist's suggestion.
Outcome:
Raju and Deepa gained insight into the circumstances that led to the problem
and were determined to bring about the desired changes. However even after
about 12 sessions there were instances wherein the past issues would come
up with disagreements and bitterness but would calm down within a few
minutes. Each had become tolerant towards the other. The problem of the
child which was denied by the husband initially was accepted and they became
more compliant with the child's follow ups. Mrs. Deepa who was working
in their own company on part time basis and who had decided to discontinue
due to the misunderstanding decided to stay on. The husband agreed to return
early from work and spend some time with his wife and child. Issues related
to the in-laws 'were aslo taken up.
CASE 4
Incompatibility between the couple due to dominant male partner
Mary, 29 years of age, came to the counsellor six weeks ago with issues
of poor,self-esteem and lack of self worth. She has been married for 8 years
to Peter. However in the sessions she speaks little about him and when the
conversation turn towards him she quickly tries to change the subject. Although ,
the counsellor has noted this shift, she (counsellor) has not challenged her
regarding this relationship as the counsellor tries to work on different areas
and issues leading up to the relationship.
At the appointed time today Mary shows up with an unannounced Peter
for her session. He said he was there because Mary was changing and he
wanted to play a role in what goes on in the session, while getting a notion
about what is in Mary's mind at the moment.
Throughout the session Peter dominates and bullies Mary into answers that
she, would not normally give. At one point Peter tries to stand over the
counsellor who challenges this behaviour. Throughout the session the
therapist counsellor feels uncomfortable and has feelings of sympathy for the
client.
At the end of a very strained session Peter declares that he thinks it would
be better if he came to all the sessions so he can see what goes on and
what the counsellor is trying to fill her head with.
/
In the subsequent sessions Peter realizes what has been happening to him
all these years and his resentment towards the therapist subsides and he slowly
starts opening up and requests for independent sessions for himself.
In the next few sessions he discloses about the discord of his parents and
the belligerent mother who never cared for the mild and forbearing father who
had to suffer at the hands of his mother. Admitting that he didn't want history
to repeat itself he started controlling Mary. He also reported of a lot of guilt
about the way he has been treating Mary all these years and how depressed
she has been suppressing everything.
The counsellor suggested some activities together for the couple when she
realized that there was none between them. Though both Peter and Mary
adored kids, they had not discussed about having kids though married for
8 years.
Outcome:
At the end of the eighteenth session the couple had resolved most of their
problems, had adhered to the home work tasks allotted, had planned for a
3-week holiday abroad and also had plans about having a child and requested
for a termination as it was already mentioned by the counsellor earlier.
CASE 5
A client with recurrent depressive disorder with inadequate coping skills
and interpersonal problems with mother-in-law
Mrs. Shobha is a homemaker in her early thirties, an Arts graduate married
for the last 5Y2 years to a businessman who owned an electronic shop-sales
and servicing with a 4 year old daughter. From the beginning stayed with
the in-laws. Her adjustment with the husband was satisfactory initially but
I
slowly became disturbed due to the family circumstances. Mother-in-law
stayed in the same family off and on. About 4-5 months stayed with another
daughter in Bangalore. Whenever she was at home would nag the patient
mainly about her work and child care. She criticized that she did not know
how to care for the kid. Whenever the child fell sick would not allow the
child to be taken to the hospital and would resort to home remedies, will
not allow the child to eat many food items saying it would cause 'cold', 'heat'
and so on. The child slowly started refusing food and would throw tantrums
for each and everything that she was not able to manage. Mrs. Shobha also
had the third episode of depression and her medication compliance was
unsatisfactory.
Mrs. Sobha was taken for supportive counselling. In the first few sessions
patient was encouraged to ventilate during which she came up about with .
a lot of information about the faf!llly and the problems faced by them and
also the temperament of each family member. The father-in-law was almost
bed-ridden with an attack of stroke, had recovered to some extent but needed
assistance for self care. Mother-in-law would grudgingly attend to them and
in her absence she helped him. Patient. reported that it was not a burden
for her as he was quite cooperative and also a good person, used to be
quite supportive towards her, consoling whenever she felt hurt by the husband's
or mother-in-law's comments.
/
Family Therapy: Meaning,
Scope and Applications
61
I
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
62
She also reported of two of her sisters-in-law (husband's sisters) who were
mentally ill (suffered from psychosis) and mother-in-law was disturbed by
it and whenever stressed would be angry towards Mrs.Sobha. Patient also
was upset because her spouse did not accompany her to the hospital and
.even there were several instances when he called her as being crazy/mad.
However took a day off at once in 2 months to accompany the sister to
the doctor and also bought her all the medications. Though this sister was
married, she stayed most of the time in their house doing nothing. However
she was nice towards the patient.
Mrs. Sobha would become perturbed on and off due to the prevailing
circumstances at home, would seek support from the mother who was a
teacher but would get snubbed by her. Mother too had an unsatisfactory
married life and could not help the patient whenever she turned to her.
Mrs. Sobha had two attempts of ISH (Intentional Self Harm) following her
problems.
Work done in therapy:
Mrs. Sobha came for regular sessions and opened up about her problems.
Her spouse also joined her for 3 sessions where he was explained about
the nature of the problem she was suffering from and the need for compliance.
The problem of the kid and his involvement in child care to some extent
atleast was pointed out. The various problems the family was going through
were discussed and some guidance and suggestions were offered. The spouse
who was also stressed out was allowed to ventilate and given some
suggestions and reassured.
A 'no suicide contract' was taken from the patient and she has been adhering
to it till date. Also the therapist has given the contact number to call in
case of distress or emergency. In the last 1 and half years patient was
admitted once for a slight exacerbation of symptoms. She was given some
suggestions related to her child's tantrums and over months the child has
become manageable and takes adequate food.
The family also had hardly any routines or rituals and was not spending
time together, these issues were also discussed.
Outcome:
• Drug compliance improved and follow up became regular.
• The child's problems have'reduced drastically.
• Able to cope with stress better.
• The patient is now able to ignore/withstand her mother-in-law's
criticisms.
• Father-in-law died peacefully and patient now has not much household
work.
• Patient started going for walks alone or occasionally with the child and
involves herself in child's school work.
• Goes for church regularly and also reads magazines.
• Watches some programmes on TV and enjoys them.
• Comes as soon as she develops some symptoms.
• Husband takes her out for shopping or his office parties and she does
enjoy them.
/
2.16 LET US SUM UP
Family therapy as a whole is based on the basic assumption that an individual's
problematic behaviour grows out of the interactional unit of the family, community,
and societal systems. Thus family therapy focusses on short-term, solutionfocused, action-oriented, and here-and-now interaction, with emphasis on how'
current family relationships contribute to the development and maintenance of
symptoms.
Specific goals are determined by family and therapist; global goal is to reduce
family's distress. The family change involves: 1) cognitive, emotional, or
behavioural changes, 2) Change needs to happen in relationships; not just within
the individual. The techniques of family therapy are tools for achieving therapeutic
goals. Personal characteristics (respect, empathy, sensitivity) are even more
important and as therapist always considers what is in the best interest of the
family. Resistance in therapy should be identified and addressed in the early
phase of therapy.
2.17 GLOSSARY
Blended family A family formed by the remarriage of a
divorced or widowed parent. It includes the
new husband and wife, plus some or all of
their children from previous marriages.
Circular causality Refers to the fact that in family systems, each
family member's behaviour is caused by and
causes the other family members' behaviours.
They are each impacting the other, in a
circular manner.
Closed systems Refers to a system with more rigid boundaries
that are not easily crossed.
Code of ethics Document used in self-regulation specifying
the standard of care.
Differentiation The ability to retain one's identity within a
family system while maintaining emotional
connections with the other members.
Emotional cut-off Reduction of anxiety in the system by
emotionally cutting off from other.
Extended family A person's family of origin plus grandparents,
in-laws, and other relatives.
Family life cycle Emphasizes how development and change in
families followed common patterns which
were shaped by the shifting patterns of
internal and external demands in any given
society.
/
Family Therapy: Meaning,
Scope and Applications
63
I
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
64
Family systems theory
Family roles
Family rules
. Genogram
Homeostasis
Multi-generational
transmission
Neutrality
Nuclear family
Open systems
System
Triangulation
/An approach to treatment that emphasizes the
interdependency of family members rather
than focusing on individuals in isolation from
the family. This theory underlies the most
influential forms of contemporary family
therapy.
What is expected of each family member. For
example, the basic types of roles are "father,"
"mother," "aunt," "daughter," "son,"
"grandmother," etc.
Are rules about how the family operates;
these rules are often unspoken. For example,
are there limits on "how much" or in what
ways kids can argue with their parents?
A family tree diagram that represents the
names, birth order, sex, and relationships
of the members of a family. Therapists use
genograms to detect recurrent patterns in
the family history and to help the members
understand their problem(s).
The tendency of a family system to maintain
internal stability and resist change.
Movement of emotional process or themes
across generations.
The therapist does not side or "unbalance",
assumes 'curious" stance, and the team helps
him to do so, taking the concerned about,
observer status.
The basic family unit, consisting of father,
mother, and their biological children.
Refers to a system with boundaries that allow
a continuous flow of information to and from
the outside world.
A biological analogy, systems theory proposes
that various activities of the body are
composed of interconnected but distinct
systems of components that operate together
in an. integrated and coordinated way to
maintain stability.
A process in which two family members
lower the tension level between them by
drawing in a third member.
2.18 ANSWERS TO CHECK YOUR PROGRESS
· EXERCISES
Check Your Progress Exercise 1
1. The main functions of family are given below:
• Socialisation of children,
• Economic cooperation and division of labour,
• Care, supervision, .monitoring , and interaction,
• Legitimising sexual relations,
• Reproduction,
• Provision of status like social-familial attributes, for example, SES,
location. Status can be a) ascribed - for example birthorder or
b) achieved means based on individuals effort, and
• Affection, emotional support and companionship.
2. The main characteristics of dysfunctional families are given below:
• Rigidity or lack of flexibility,
• Lack of individuation like enmeshmentJloss of autonomy,
• Extreme detachment,
• Scapegoating, that means a family member (often child) is the object
of displaced conflict/criticism,
• Triangulation, that means detouring conflict between two people by
involving a third person, thereby stabilizing the relationship between
the original pair,
• Faulty problem solving skills,
• Conflict avoidance,
• Inconsistent application of affection or discipline,
• Low levels of support or nurturance or acceptance, and
• Increased degree of expressed hostility towards each other or other
family members.
/
••Family Therapy: Meaning,
Scope and Applications
65
I
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy Check Your Progress Exercise 2
1 "Counselling" is probably the most appropriate term to describe the process'
when the couple or family is basically "healthy" yet seek enrichment of
their quality of life together. "Therapy" may be more appropriate when there
is a great deal of emotional stress or pain in the relationship or system.
2. Family life cycle emphasizes how development and change in families follow
common patterns, which are shaped by the shifting patterns of internal and
external demands in any given society. Families may at times be faced with
massive demands for change and adaptation. This may be the result of
changes in family composition by the birth of a child, a divorce or
remarriage, a death or perhaps due to changes in autonomy within the family,
children becoming adolescents, a woman going back to work after
childrearing, retirement etc.
Check Your Progress Exercise 3
1 Some of the indications for family therapy are:
\
• Common child psychiatric disorders,
• Child abuse,
• Eating disorders, especially anorexia nervosa,
• Depression,
• Schizophrenia,
• Marital and family distress,
• Families with problems across generational boundaries, and
• Families scapegoating a member or undermining the treatment of a
member in individual therapy.
Check Your Progress Exercise 4
1. Following are the major approaches for family therapy:
i) Psychodynamic approach,
ii) Family systems perspective,
iii) Strategic therapy,
iv) Structural family therapy,
v) Experiential therapy,
vi) Cognitive-behavioural therapy,
66
vii) Narrative therapy,
/
viii) Mutigenerational family therapy, Family Therapy: Meaning,
Scope find Applications
I
ix) Object relations,
x) Eclectic approach.
2. The salient features of multigenerational family therapy are given below:
• The application of rational thinking to emotionally saturated systems,
• A well-articulated theory is considered to be essential,
• With the proper knowledge the individual can change,
• Change occurs only with other family members,
• Triangulation-that is a pattern of interaction with two-against -one
experience. A -third party is recruited to reduce anxiety and stabilise
a couple's relationship,
• Make the most use of genograms,
• Differentiation of the self that means a psychological separation from
others.
• It involve psychological separation of intellect and emotions; and
independence of the self from others,
• The greater one's differentiation, the better one's ability to keep from
being drawn into dysfunctional patterns with other family members.
3. i) c)
ii) a)
iii) b)
Check Your Progress Exercise 5
1. Following are the techniques used in family therapy:
i) Genogram,
ii) Family floor plan,
ill) Reframing,
iv) Tracking,
v) Joining,
vi) Family sculpting,
vii) Building communication skills, 67
/ I
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy $) Strategic tasks,
ix) Restructuring, and
x) Circular questioning.
2 Following are the techniques that can challenge and unbalance the family
system during restructuring:
i) Enactment,
ii) Reenactment,
iii) Actualizing family transactional patterns,
iv) Marking boundaries,
v) Escalating stress,
vi) Assigning tasks,
vii) Utilizing eymptoms,
viii) Paradoxical injunction,
ix) Manipulating mood in the family, and
x) Support, education and guidance.
Check Your Progress Exercise 6
1 The term "resistance" refers to the maladaptive interactive patterns that keep
families from entering treatment.
2 Following are the essential personal moral qualities required in a counsellor
or family therapist:
i) Empathy,
ii) Warmth,
iii) Congruence,
iv) Sincerity,
v) Integrity,
vi) Resilience,
vii) Respect,
viii) Humility,
ix) Completence 68
/
x) Fairness,
xi) Wisdom, and
xii) Courage.
2.19 UNIT END QUESTIONS
1. Write a brief note on models of family therapy.
2. Describe some techniques of family therapy.
3. When is CBT in the familycontext indicated? Discuss CBT in family conext
with help of examples.
4. How do you detect resistance in family therapy?
2.20 FURTHER READINGS AND REFERENCES
bacp : ethical framework: values of Counselling and psychotherapy. Returned
from: http://www.bacp.co.uk/ethicaLframeworklvalues.php
bacp : ethical framework: Personal moral qualities http://www.bacp.co.ukl
ethical_frameworklpersonal.php
bacp : ethical framework: Personal moral qualities http://www.bacp.co.ukl
ethical_frameworklpersonal.php
Barker, P. (1986) Basic family therapy. London: Collins.
Bergin, A.E., & Garfield, S.L. (Eds.) (1944). Handbook of psychotherapy
and behaviour change. New York: John Wiley and Sons.
Carkhuff, RR (1993). The art of helping VIII. Amherst, MA: Human Resource
. .
Development Press.
Carkhuff, RR (2000). Human possibilities. Amherst, MA: Possibilities Publishing.
Carr, A. (2000). Family therapy: Concepts, process & practice. New Delhi:
Wiley & Sons.
Cormier, S. & Cormier, B. (1998) Interviewing strategies for helpers:
Fundamental skills cognitive behavioural interventions (4th ed.). Pacific
Grove, CA: Brooks/Cole Publishing Company.
Corsini, J.R, Wedding, D. & Itasca, I.L. (1995). Current psychotherapies.
F.E.: Peacock Publishers Inc.
Egan, G. (1998). Exercises in helping skills: A manual to accompany the
skilled helper (6th Ed). Pacific Grove, CA: Brooks/Cole.
/
,Family Therapy: Meaning,
Scope and Applications
69
I
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
70
Egan, G. (1998). The skilled helper: A systematic approach to effective
helping (6th Ed.). Pacific Grove, CA: Brooks/Cole.
Genograms: Constructing and Interpreting Interaction Patterns. Retrived from
http://www.genograms.org/
Howells, J.G. (1975). Principles of family psychiatry. New York: Brunner/
·Mazel.
Introduction to the Genogram Retrived from - http://www.genopro.com/genogram/
?r=google&c=genogram&gclid~CNG_6rC03KUCFYQc6wodDDNDlg
Ivey, A. E. (1994). Intentional interviewing and Counselling (3rd ed.). Pacific
Grove, CA: Brooks/Cole Publishing Company.
National Association of Cognitive-Behavioural Therapists, http://www.nacbt.org/
whatiscbt.htm
Sharf, R.S. (2004). Theories of psychotherapy and counselling, (3rd ed).
Pacific Grove, CA. Brooks/Cole.
Smith, R. L. & Stevens. Basic techniques in marriage and family counselling
and therapy (ED350526 ) ERIC Digest. ERIC Clearinghouse on Counselling
and Personnel Services Ann Arbor MI. 1992-04-15
What is a Genogram? Retrived from http://www.familytiesproject.org/
genograminstructions.htm .
/
UNIT 3 CAREER COUNSELLING
Structure
3.1 Introduction
3.2 What is Career Counselling?
3.3 Who Needs Career Counselling?
3.4 Distinctive Features of Career Counselling
3.5 Factors that Influence Career Decisions
3.5.1 Family
3.5.2 Peers
3.5.3 Social Norms
3.5.4 Life Events
3.6 Theories of Career Counselling
3.6.1 Trait-Factor Theory
3.6.2 Structural Theories
3.6.3 Developmental Theories
3.6.4 Decision Making Theories
3.6.5 Social Learning Theory
3.6.6 Community Interaction Theory
3.7 Techniques of Career Counselling
3.7.1 Card Sorts
3.7.2 Aptitude Tests
3.7.3 Vocational Interest Inventories
3.7.4 Personality Inventories
3.7.5 Use of Computer-Assisted Programmes
3.7.6 Interview Role Play
3.7.7 Information Services
3.7.8 Special Techniques for Adolescents
3.8 The Career Counselling Process
3.9 Importance of Career Counselling in Today's Context
3.10 Let Us Sum Up
3.11 Glossary
3.12 Answers to Check Your Progress Exercises
3.13 Unit End Questions
3.14 Further Readings and References
3.1 INTRODUCTION
In a world in which the concept of a 'career' is becoming increasingly fluid,
career guidance is not a once-in-a-lifetime experience which orients a person
in a particular direction for all time. The most influential factor in young people's
71
/ I
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
72
choice of degree course is advice from parents. Family members exert a powerful
influence on the self-concept and thought patterns of clients who seek career
guidance and the decision which they make about themselves in relation to work
or education or the absence of these activities. These decisions often have a
significant impact on other aspects of their lives and the people around them.
Effective career guidance therefore cannot be given in a vacuum. It must take
into account the life circumstances in which the next phase of a person's career
will be set. The information given in this Unit will help you to understand and
become familiar with objectives of career counselling.
Objectives
After studying this Unit, you will be able to:
• Understand career counselling and its objectives;
• Explain factors influencing career decision;
• Identify reasons to choose a career based on the theories of career
counselling;
• Discuss techniques used in career counselling and the process of career
counselling; and
• Describe the importance of career counselling in today's context.
3.2 WHAT IS CAREER COUNSELLING?
Career counselling involves all activitiesthat seek to disseminate information about
present or future vocations in such a way that individuals become more
knowledgeable and aware about who they are in relationship to the world of
work. Career counselling is for people who are pretty normal and have no
emotional problems that would interfere with developing a rational approach
to making a vocational or career choice.
Super (1957) defines career as, "the course of events that constitutes a life;
the sequence of occupations and other life roles which combine to express one's
commitment to work in her or his total pattern of self-development; the series
of remunerated and nonremunerated positions occupied by a person from
adolescence through retirement, of which occupation is only one. A career
includes work-related roles such as those of student, employee, and pensioner
together with a vocational, familial and civic roles".
Brown and Brooks (1991) define career counselling as follows, "Career
counselling is an interpersonal process designed to assist individuals with career
development problems. Career development is the process of choosing, entering,
adjusting to and advancing in an occupation. It is a lifelong process that interacts
dynamically with other life roles. Career problems include, but are not limited
to, career indecisions and undecidedness, work performance, stress and
adjustment, incongruence of the person and work environment, and inadequate
or unsatisfactory integration of life roles with other life roles (for example parent,
friend, citizen)".
/
Aims of Career Counselling
Following are the main aims of career counselling:
1. Assess their career development needs at various points in their lives,
2. Enable vocational exploration or information,
3. Understand and resolve clients' conflict between themselves and others over
choice of a career or performance on a job,
Career Counselling
4. Understand the process of effective choice of a career,
5. Explore self-conflict, ambivalence, or mixed motivations about two or more
different occupations,
6. Resolve conflicts arising from transitions in life that are causing problems,
affecting a career,
7. Take appropriate action to implement these objectives,
8. Provide confirmation of a plan, and
9. Clarify their objectives for the future.
3.3 WHO NEEDS CAREER COUNSELLING?
While guidance may be associated primarily with people who are setting out
on a career path after leaving education or those who have been forcibly evicted
from their employment by redundancy, the need for guidance can occur for
anyone at any time. The following are among the groups of people who can
be identified as in need of career counselling: "
1. People leaving education at school or college level,
2. People wishing to return to education in order to improve their employment
prospects, acquire new skills or update their knowledge and skills after
a career break,
3. Retumees from career breaks who wish to know about options open to
them in resuming or changing their careers,
4. People whose jobs are redundant or insecure,
5. Workers who are achieving little job satisfaction and want to find more
rewarding employment,
6. People whose jobs are too stressful,
7. People whose hopes of promotion have not been fulfilled and who want
to stimulate their career development by being proactive,
8. People who want to switch from full-time to part-time work ,and vice versa,
9. People contemplating setting up their own business, and
10. Older workers, who are approaching retirement, but want to find meaningful
occupations in the broadest sense, which will lead to self-fulfillment and
a sense of being valued by the community.
73
/ I
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
74 '
3.4 DISTINCTIVE FEATURES OF CAREER
COUNSELLING
Career counselling parallels other kinds of counselling, but itfocuses on planning
and making decisions about occupations and education. As in all counselling,
the personal relationship between the counsellor and the client is critical. Values
and attitudes are explored in career counselling, but more information and factual
data in occupational areas are required than in personal counselling.
In the case of career counselling while the client may see his or her uncertainty
and confusion as a major 'problem', the careers adviser tends to see the matter
not as a problem, but as an issue to be discussed, explored and resolved as
part of that person's development- if not in the initial interview, then at least
within a reasonable timescale. This approach gives a very positive tenor to most
careers interviews, with a view to encourage the client to cease regarding
occupational choice as a problem. Also, in the final stages of counselling,
decisions about career choice or career development's are made as part of the
expected changes in attitudes and behaviours.
a) Emotional problems
b) Vocational problems
c) Psychological problems
d) Legal problems
Check Your Progress Exercise 1 .
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space
provided below .
. b) Check your answers with those provided at the end 'of this Unit.
1. Tick (.I) the appropriate choice.
i) Career counselling is meant for people with:
2. Fill in the blanks:
i) Career counselling is defined as an interpersonal process designed
to assist individuals in career development. It is a process of _
and , adjusting to and advancing in a vocation.
ii) The major difference between career counselling and counselling for
other personal and social concerns lies in the additional information
gathered in the area of. _
3.5 FACTORS THAT INFLUENCE CAREER
DECISIONS
3•5.1 . Family
The interactions of the individual within the family have an important impact
on her or his emotions, behaviour and life decisions. The psychological
.,-.
environment and the behavioural norms provided by the family are important,
but largely have unconscious influences on the individual in deciding on the career.
In a careers interview it is often important to explore to what extent the client's
thinking on career issues is being shaped by the views of the family. Some
of the tensest situations arise when maturing adults experience a serious mismatch
between their parents' expectations of them and what they themselves want or
feel capable of achieving. Similarly; where a client is proposing to follow a line
of action contrary to her or his own wishes because of perceived, external
pressure, then the counsellor may wish to raise the client's awareness of her
or his reasons for opting for a particular route. This can occur for a variety
of reasons.
Career Counselling
Some parents, when investing in their children's education either through paying
for schooling or through supporting them through university, see themselves as
'making sacrifices'. When parents expect.that their son or daughter will treat
study and the subsequent job search as a serious matter from the start, then
the young person may perceive a dilemma between satisfying parental demands
and following her or his own personal route.
Other parents may be tempted to try to live their own unfulfilled ambitions through
their families. In such cases a child can be virtually brainwashed from an early
age into accepting how wonderful it would be to become a doctor or an actor
or a commando. Some young people may satisfy their parents' hopes in fulfilling
their own ambition and the dream is then achieved for both generations. In
other cases, however, a point is reached at which the young persons have to
acknowledge the fact that the lifestyle chosen for them by their parents is not
working for them and to recognise their own lack of commitment at heart to
this 'chosen' occupation.
Sometimes parents can have difficulty accepting the fact that their children are
not as intelligent or athletic or musical or business-oriented or otherwise talented
as they would like or imagine them to be. This can result in parental expectations
well beyond the young adult's capabilities, irrespective of any amounts of cajoling
and extra tuition. Such a situation of low self-esteem can be exacerbated if
parents, whether wittingly or unwittingly, hold up one sibling as an example to
the others. The favoured child may either revel in or become embarrassed by
this situation, which in itself can cause further tensions within the family.
3.5.2 Peers
Alongside parental influence, the desire for acceptance by peers has a powerful
influence, particularly in adolescence.
The uncertainty which is experienced during 'this phase may lead the young person
to seek a common identity with a group of peers. Alternatively, she or he might
choose to underachieve academically in order not to be out of step with a
group which prizes other forms of behaviour rather than acadeinic achievement
and perhaps because there is an underlying wish to r.ebel against her or his
parents. In either case the urge to be acceptable to peers by being as like
them as possible may transcend the need to clarify and follow her or his own
individual goals. In the course of their explorations the adolescents begin to
realise that 'peer pressure' had influenced many of the decisions they had made
about their life. They became aware that it was time for them to begin to take
more responsibility for their own decisions and actions. 75
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
76
3.5.3 Social Norms
Beyond the influence of family and peers, there lies a complex set of social
mores and norms which specific cultures lay down in order to regulate society
and to differentiate between what the majority call 'normal' and 'abnormal'
behaviour that also determine an individual's course of action in deciding on
a career. Such groups have a tendency to operate in stereotypes and discriminate
against those who cannot or will not conform to the social norms.
Learning also occurs through observation of other people's behaviour and its
consequences for the individual. The most likely outcome is that individuals will
copy behaviours which they see modeled by people with whom they identify.
The careers adviser has an important role to play in ensuring that individuals
are encouraged to think beyond these stereotypes and not confine their
occupational choices. Along with these they are also given strategies for coping
with difficulties which they may encounter.
3.5.4 Life Events
As individuals develop, significant events can happen in their lives, causing them
to reappraise their values, their self-concept, relationship to others and their
careers. These experiences include leaving home, marriage and the birth of a
child, the loss of a significant person through death or other means, becoming
seriously ill or disabled and a variety of other circumstances which somehow
change life for the individual .
.'
Such turning points in life require the individual to make a transition from one
state of being, thinking or doing to another. Although individuals vary in their
capacity to cope with change and adapt to new sets of circumstances and
relationships, most people need time to work through the process of accepting
change and moving on to the next stage.
3.6 THEORIES OF CAREER COUNSELLING
Professional interest in the process of how an individual selects an occupation
is relatively new. With industrialisation and urbanisation, vocational choices were
no longer limited to what a person's father or mother did or to the types of
work that existed within a partioular community. The ever-increasing range of
occupational alternatives and the accompanying uncertainties and confusion
created the need for professional assistance in selecting a career. As the field
of career counselling has attempted to meet the need, various theoretical
rationales have been developed to provide a framework for the practice of career
counselling.
3.6.1 Trait-Factor Theory
The trait-factor theory is based on the assumption that each person possesses
a uniquely organised pattern of personal traits (interests, abilities and person
./ characteristics) that are fairly stable and seldom change after late adolescence
(Williamson, 1965). Advocates of the theory assumed that a person's abilities
and traits could be measured objectively and quantified. Personal motivation
was considered relatively stable. Occupations can also be profiled by analysing
them in terms of the amounts of the various individual traits they require. Thus,
satisfaction in a particular occupation depended on a proper fit between one's
abilities and the job requirements.
/
A major task of the career counsellor who is oriented toward trait-factor theory
is to assist people in making better career decisions by helping them become
more knowledgeable about their own traits, learn more about job requirements
and match those personal characteristics with the job requirements.
Career Counselling
3.6.2 Structural Theories
Roe in 1956 theorised and researched the concept that there are definite
personality differences between members of various occupations and that these
differences are attributable to early parent-child relationships. She postulates
three psychological climates in the home that are a function of parent-child
relations:
1) Emotional concentration on the child - either by overprotecting or over
demanding climate;
2) Avoidance of the child - either by neglecting or rejecting climate; and
3) Acceptance of the child - either by casual or loving climate.
Deficiencies during childhood can be compensated for, by, and through work.
Thus, individuals who did not receive sufficient praise and respect from their
parents may attempt to elicit these through their work and, subsequently, may
seek jobs that can bring them praise and respect. The same holds true for
other needs that were unmet at earlier stages of development. The individual
turns to work to gratify these needs.
Roe's insights help the counsellor to better understand the variety of factors
that play a part in the individual's decision to pursue or avoid certain jobs,
as well as to understand why a job does or does not meet an individual's
needs.
Holland (1985) proposed his theory which is a theory of personality structure
as well as of vocational choice. It focuses primarily upon vocational choice,
but it is also concerned with emotional functioning, creativity and personal
development. Holland's theory emphasises that the typology of the individual
and the typology of the working environment are essential factors in work
satisfaction. To emphasise this person-situation correspondence, Holland has
classified work environments into the six categories analogous to the six
personal orientations that are realistic, investigative, artistic, social, enterprising,
or conventional. By doing so, Holland makes explicit that occupations are ways
of life, help to define social status, life style and standard of living. He postulates
that stereotypes of occupations have important psychological and sociological
significance. Thus, he suggests that a person's occupational choice can have
limited but useful value as a projective device in revealing motivations, insight
and self understanding.
Since these theories all stress the importance of need satisfaction in choosing
an occupation, it becomes highly important for a structurally oriented counsellor
to assess client's cognitive, affective and social needs. Counsellors are then
able to provide clients with enough career information to allow them choose
a career that will satisfy their needs and be congruent with their personality
structure. 77
/
-I
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
78
3.6.3 Developmental Theories
Ginzberg and his associates (1951) were early leaders in theorising about career
development as a process that culminates in an occupational choice in one's
early twenties. That is, as each occupationally relevant decision is made, other
choices are eliminated. They identified four set of factors that interact to
influence the ultimate career choice: individual values, emotional factors, amount
and kind of education, and impact of reality through environmental pressures.
Ginzberg and his associates also identified three phases in the period of career
choice development: fantasy (from birth to age eleven), tentative (from ages
eleven to seventeen), and realistic (between ages seventeen and early twenties).
During these life stages individuals are faced with certain tasks. As they confront
these tasks, they make compromises between wishes and possibilities and each
compromise contributes to the irreversibility of the unfolding process.
The theory that is most widely used in career development is the one proposed
by Super (1953). His theory of career choice is based on the idea that individual's
self concepts influence their occupational choice and their ultimate satisfaction
or dissatisfaction with their choice. This vocational choice is the result of a
developmental process that puts the individual's self-concept into practice. It
is a theory of career development rather than of occupational choice. The jobs
individuals hold over a lifetime represent the development of their self-concept
as expressed in their world of work.
3.6.4 Decision Making Theories
The major concept in decision-making theory is that each individual has several
possible alternatives from which to choose. Each alternative has identifiable results
or consequences. Each of the anticipated results has a specific value for the
individual, a value that can be estimated through some method of psychological
. scaling. Therefore, if the resulting values of the alternatives can be arranged
in a hierarchy, the probable occurrence of each outcome can also be determined.
Bergland (1974) has identified a sequence of events that occur in decision
making, including the following steps:
• Defining the problem,
• Generating alternatives,
• Gathering information,
• Processing information,
• Making plans and selecting goals, and
• Implementing and evaluating plans.
Together, these emphases in decision making suggest that the individual needs
both a prediction system and a value system that permit decisions to be made
among preferences and expectancies for action within a climate of uncertainty.
3.6.5 Social Learning Theory
A theory of social learning within occupational choice has been developed by
Mitchell, Jones and Krumboltz (1979). This theory identifies four conditions
which influence an individual's perception of realistic career options:
Career Counselling
Factors
Genetic and abilities
Environment
Learning experiences
Consequences
Physical and mental endowment rule out some
occupations (for example, eyesight deficiency for a
pilot) and make others possible (musical ability for
a singer).
Lack of social and educational opportunities or
encouragement to aspire for ambitious goals may
depress an individual's career expectations.
The presence or absence of role models to whom
an individual can relate will influence her or his views
on what is possible for someone of her or his gender,
social class, ethnic origin and general background to
achieve.
Unless an individual has learned to clarify her or his
values, seek information, evaluate the consequences
of career options, choose a preferred option and plan
in order to achieve it, her or his sense of control
over career choice will remain under-developed and
she or he will remain passive instead of proactive
in determining her or his career.
At the other end of the spectrum is the opportunity structure theory of Ken
Robert (1968). Roberts' thesis is that for most people occupational choice is
structured by factors outside the individual, including social class, educational
opportunities and the current state of the labour market, depending on economic
trends in supply and demand.
Task approach skills
3.6.6 Community Interaction Theory
According to Law's (1981) community interaction theory, community consists
of peers, neighbours, teachers, other authority figures, ethnic groups and hierarchy
of social classes. He identifies five ways in which the community influences
people.
1. Expectations:Communicated explicitly or implicitly by family members and
peers. Conflicting expectations may confuse the individual's career choice.
2. Feedback: Reactions by others to the individual's tentative career choice
confirm or deny her or his suitability for particular occupational roles in
the eyes of the community.
3. Support: Encouragement from sectors of the community can reinforce
the individual's career choice and enable her or him to progress towards it.
4. Modeling: Observation of other people in work roles helps the individual
to decide whether a similar occupation might suit her or him. This is
powerfully reinforced if the role model comes from a similar background.
5. Information:As members of a community, individuals receive both factual
data about employment and impressions gained from people in work. These
can help to shape their view of the types of work available and suited
to their own needs.
79
/
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
80
1. Would you recommend career counselling to a person who has mixed
motivations about two or more different occupations?
Check Your Progress Exercise 2
Note: a) Read the following questions carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answers with those provided at the end of this Unit.
2. Apart from family, peers, life events and influence
an individua1's career choice.
3. The major task of the counsellor who is oriented towards trait factor
theory is to help the individual:
a) Choose from the several possible alternatives of careers available
based on consequences.
b) Match personal characteristics with job requirements.
c) Trace career decisions to early parent-child relations.
d) Understand the developmental process culminating in an occupational
choice.
4. According to the social learning theory, genetics, environment,
_____ .and influence an individual's perception of
realistic career options.
3.7 TECHNIQUES IN CAREER COUNSELLING
Assessment is an important part of the work of those involved in career
counselling and consultation. In particular, the counsellor should be aware of
the factors in career counselling:
• Appraisal of the client's characteristicsincluding intelligence, interests, special
abilities, aspirations, needs and values among other qualities,
• Introduction of outside information,
• Exploration of alternatives,
• Clarification of occupational possibilities,
• Integration of the factual material with the personal information, and
• Decision making.
The various instruments available to aid the counsellor in assessing this information
include:
• Card sorts;
/
• Psychometric instruments; aptitude tests, vocational interest inventories,
personality inventories;
Career Counselling
• Computer-aided guidance systems;
• Interview role play; and
• Information services.
The counsellor uses her or his professional skills to decide on the most
appropriate instruments. Care must be taken, however, not to confuse or
demotivate the client by suggesting the use of too many of these tools at one
time. The counsellor must make careful decisions based on the perceived needs
of the client and the objectives which the instrument can fulfill. Much of this
assessment is completed internally but can be shared with the client, thereby,
enhancing the cooperative nature of the interview. Affirm, where necessary, that
the counsellor will offer appropriate interpretation and feedback.
3.7.1 Card Sorts
Some clients have difficulty in understanding the importance of identifying the
skills they have or the value systems which they are operating from. Others
may find difficulty in verbalising these. Card sorts can be used to aid these
processes. The client is asked to sort a number of cards, each describing a
particular skill or value, into, for instance, their order of importance to the client.
This is a tool which can facilitate the cooperative nature of the interview. It
aids the acknowledgement and exploration of some of the real issues for the
client.
3.7.2 Aptitude Tests
Aptitude tests set out to measure a client's specific ability in a particular area.
They involve helping the client to look more objectively at themselves in relation
to different types of jobs.
They are especially useful when:
.• A client is trying to decide between two or three types of work;
Two aptitude batteries are predominant in vocational counselling; the Differential
Aptitude Test (DAT), given widely in high schools, and the General Aptitude
Test Battery (GATB), administered most often by state employment offices to
the general population. 81
• Where the client is unrealistic (over- or under-confident) about the level
of her or his ability;
• Where the client wants to get some experience of the kinds of tests
employers use in selection;
• Where the client is confused about the level of ability she or he has in
a particular area; and
• A client has had considerable work experience and needs to stand back
from considering the tasks involved to review how they work with people,
their thinking style and their emotional balance.
/
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
82
3.7.3 Vocational Interest Inventories
Vocational interest inventories, in which clients compare themselves to groups
of people in various occupations, are the most popular measures used in
counselling. The Strong-Campbell Interest Inventory (SCII), the Kuder
Occupational Interest Survey (KOIS), and Holland's Self-Directed Search
(SDS) are examples of widely used interest inventories. The client's profile of
interests is compared with people employed successfully in a wide variety of
occupations in SCII. These occupations are grouped according to Holland's
personality types and environmental structures.
3.7.4 Personality Inventories
Personality inventories are used by counsellors in career counselling who believe
that personality characteristics relate to career development. Some counsellors
also administer personality inventories if they sense that personal conflicts are
interfering with career resolution.
The California Psychological Inventory (CPI), the Edwards Personal Preference
Schedule (EPPS), are representative of personality inventories used in vocational
counselling.
3.7.5 Use of Computer-Assisted Programmes
Computer-assisted programmes are most useful in counselling when counsellors
and clients are ready to explore career information. It is virtually impossible
for counsellors to organise, edit, classify and dispense the tremendous amount
of information available describing occupations, occupational characteristics and
occupational requirements. Also, only through computer database can counsellors
keep up with the ever-changing trends, with up-to-date projections about jobs
and with new job descriptions.
However, computers can give only limited help to clients in their explorations
about themselves and about their interactions with others. In addition, clients
often need a counsellor's help in expressing what their interests are or in clarifying
perceptions about their own abilities before using a computer. Also, material
gained from computer-assisted programes is best synthesised and integrated in
counselling sessions. Computers, then do not replace counsellors. They assist
them in counselling. The major computer assisted programs are Discover and
SIGI.
3.7.6 Interview Role Play
This is potentially a very powerful tool and is particularly useful where:
• The client wants to prepare for an impending interview;
• The client has consistently failed to achieve a job offer following interview
and needs to diagnose what is going wrong; and
• The client significantly lacks confidence, underestimates her or his ability
or is over-confident.
The practice interview provides real evidences of behaviour which allows the
adviser to intervene effectively and help the client develop appropriate skills.
This tool can be offered in a variety of formats depending on the needs of
the client and the circumstances and settings of the environment in which the
counselling interview takes place.
/
3.7.7 Information Services Career Counselling
Currently there is a vast explosion of information in society - no less so in .
the career world. In addition to conventional written information, the adviser
can draw on computer-generated video material. Experienced counsellors draw
on information gathered from visits to employers and contact with other clients
which may be of value. There are three guiding principles for the adviser in
providing information sources forthe client. These are:
1. The information must be accurate and up to date;'
2. The information must be provided at a level which is appropriate for the
individual client; and
3. The information must be accessible to the client.
3.7.8 Special Techniques for Adolescents
Several techniques have proven quite effective in helping adolescents crystallise
ideas about careers. Some involve the use of fantasies, such as imagining a
typical day in future, an awards ceremony, a mid-career change, or retirement.
More concrete exercises might include completing an occupational family tree
to find out how present interest compares with the careers of family members.
Another career focus within high schools is youth apprenticeship, a popular
approach that provides work-based learning for adolescents. They help students
who are not college-bound make a smooth transition from high school to the
primary work environment.
3.8 THE CAREER COUNSELLING PROCESS
Career development has been described as a process shaped by an interaction
of self-references, self-knowledge, knowledge about training and occupations,
educational and occupational options. The career counselling process is
characterised as comprising the following four stages:
• Building the relationship: The key task of this stage is to establish working
alliance.
• Enabling clients' self-understanding: The main task is to help clients
deepen their understanding and their insight into their situation.
• Exploring new perspectives: At the third stage the clients develop new
perspectives on their problems.
• Forming strategies and plans: The central activity here is in preparing
for the end of the counselling relationship by helping clients set goals and
decide on the steps they need to take to achieve them.
3.9 IMPORTANCE OF CAREER
COUNSELLING IN TODAY'S CONTEXT
One of the most profound changes in the past few decades has been in the
area of attitudes toward work. An increasing number of people no longer view
work as toil and drudgery; rather, they see it as a means of personal expression, .
of growing and building self-esteem, and of satisfying personal needs. In the
past individuals typically remained in a particular occupation throughout most 83
-I/
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
84
of their lives. Today, more are changing their occupations many times in their
lives.
From a career standpoint, we are now living in an age in which the rapidity
of technological development can affect what we do and how we do it almost
overnight resulting in increasing numbers of adults who of necessity make career
decisions throughout their working life span. In addition, more and more people
are questioning the validity of yearly income as the sole criterion of occupational
success and are changing from higher-paying jobs to lower-paying jobs simply
because they find them more desirable in other respects such as personal need
fulfillrnent, living where they want to, and having time to spend with their family.
Check Your Progress Exercise 3
Note: a) Read the following question carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answer with that provided at the end of this Unit
I. Fill in the blanks:
1. Aptitude tests are used for measuring, _
2. The four stages of career counselling process are _
_____ and _
3. Cards sort technique primarily helps in identifying and
_____ of the individual.
3.10 LET US SUM UP
Some of the advices from informal sources like parents, friends may be sound,
well-researched and appropriately targeted, but this is not always the case.
Because such 'advice givers' are not specialists in careers work and may deal
with careers enquiries infrequently. Also the advice may be at best, limited and,
at worst, out of date, erroneous and misleading. Dramatic changes in the world
of work and the increased need for career assistance among all ages has resulted
in career counselling and placement receiving a new impetus in recent decades .
•
3.11 GLOSSARY
Career counselling : An interpersonal process designed to assist individual
in career development.
CPI : California Psychological Inventory
DAT : Differential Aptitude Test
EPPS : Edwards Personal Preferences Schedule
GABT General Aptitude Test Battery
KOIS Kuder Occupational Interest Survey
SCII
SDS
Strong-Camphell Interest Inventory
Self Directed Search
3.12 ANSWERS TO CHECK YOUR PROGRESS
EXERCISES
Career Counselling
Check Your Progress Exercise 1
1. i) b) Vocational problems
2. i) choosing, entering
ii) occupations
Check Your Progress Exercise 2
1. Yes.
2. social norms
3. b) Match personal characteristics with job requirements.
4. learning experiences, task approach skills
Check Your Progress Exercise 3
1. Client's specific ability
2. building the relationship, enabling clients' self-understanding, exploring
new perspectives, forming strategies and plans
3. skill, value system
" I
3.13 UNIT~END QUESTIONS
1. Define career counselling and list down its distinctive features.
2. Discuss the various factors that can influence a career decision in one's
life.
3. List theories of career counselling and explain any two of them.
4. What are the major techniques in career counselling?
5. Describe the career counselling process with the help of''an example.
3.14 FURTHER READINGS AND REFERENCES
Ali, L. & Graham, B. (1996). Theoretical background to counselling. In S.
Lendrum (Ed.). The counselling approach to careers guidance. New York:
Routledge.
Brown, S.D. & Lent, R.W. (1980). Handbook of counselling psychology.
New York: John Wiley & Sons, Inc.
Bergland, B. (1974). Career planning: The use of sequential evaluated experience.
In E.L. Herd (Ed.), Vocational guidance and human development. Houghton
Miftlin.
Brown, D. & Brooks, L. (1991). Career counselling techniques: A
developmental approach. Englewood Cliff NJ: Prentice-Hal1.
85
/ I
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
86
Ginzberg, E., Ginsburg, S.W., Axelrad, S. & Herman, 1.L. (1951). Occupational
. choice: An approach to a general theory. New York: Columbia University
Press.
George, RL.& Cristiani, T.S. (1990). Counselling: Theory and practice.
Englewood Cliffs, N.J.: Prentice- Hall.
Gibson, RL. &, Mitchell, M.H. (1999). Introduction to counselling and
guidance, New Jersey: Merrill, Prentice Hall.
Holland, J.L. (1985). Making vocational choices. 2nd (ed), Englewood
Cliffs, N.J.: Prentice- Hall.
Holland, 1.L., Magoon, T.M. & Spokane, AR (1981). Counselling psychology:
Career interventions, research and theory. Annual Review of Psychology,
32279-305.
Jersild, AT., Brook, J.S. & Brook, D.W. (1978). The psychology of
adolescence. New York: Macrnillan Publishing Co., Inc.
Law, W. (1981). Community interaction: Amid-range focus for theories of career
development in young adults. British Journal of Guidance and Counselling,
9,2,43-57.
Mitchell, A M., Jones, B. & Krumboltz, J. (1979). Social learning and career
decision making. Carole Press, 1979.
Roberts, K. (1986). The entry into employment: An approach towards a general
theory. Sociological Review,16:165-84
Super, D.E.(1957) The psychology of careers. New York: Harper.
Whiston, S.c., Sexton, T.L. & Lasoff, D.L. (1998). Career-intervention
outcome: A replication and extension of Oliver and Spokane. Journal of
counselling Psychology, 45: 150-65.
Woolfe, R, Dryden, W. & Strawbridge, S. (2003). Handbook of counselling
psychology. London: Sage Publications.
/
UNIT 4 FAMILY THEORIES IN PRACTICE
Structure
4.1 Introduction
4.2 Crisis Theory
4.2.1 Introduction
4.2.2 Concepts of Crisis Theory
4.2.3 Types of Crisis
4.2.4 Stages of Crisis
4.2.5 Intervention
4.3 Empowerment Theory
4.3.1 Introduction
4.3.2 Concepts of Empowerment Theory
4.3.3 Level of Empowerment
4.3.4 Expression of Empowerment
4.3.5 Characteristics of Empowered Families
4.3.6 Intervention
4.4 Intergenerational Theory
4.4.1 Introduction
4.4.2 Concepts of Intergenerational Theory
4.4.3 Intervention
4.5 Let Us Sum Up
4.6 Glossary
4.7 Answers to Check Your Progress Exercises
4.8 Unit End Questions
4.9 Further Readings and References
4.1 INTRODUCTION
India is a country with the myriad of different family structures; joint family,
extended family, nuclear family, single parent family etc. Drastic change in the
ethos of Indian families has been responsible for issues emerging within the family
environment; families are struggling between traditional and modem values. With
the advent of industrialisation and globalisation, people and relationships are all
undergoing a sea of change. The definitions, roles, expectations and individual
positions within a family unit are also subject to change. Family is no longer
limited to socio-emotional needs, and financial need is a major perogative for
its members. The market is flooded with products, services that tend to entice
people into buying, and going for superior lifestyles, all of which depend on
the monetary conditions of a family.
Especially in urban India, parents are sacrificing family time and bonding to give
the best to their children in terms of education, nutrition, clothing and other
87
/ I
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
88
facilities. Communication and family bonding is a weekly affair, and limited to
Sunday meals, courtesy: the emerging corporate culture that is longer work hours,
touring places, carrying work home and socialising as a means to climb the
corporate ladder and so on. Moreover, the members fiercely guard individual
space and privacy and any kind of interruption is not taken too kindly.
Issues are becoming more complicated due to inter-generational differences,
which become prominent due to differences in perspectives and attitudes towards
people and relationships. All these issues and many more such issues are coming
to the fore, demanding alternatives to deal with them in a comprehensive and
holistic manner. Issues and differences within a family are no longer confined
to the walls of the house. Coming out in the open about issues and seeking
professional help to sort out familial issues is no more 'washing one s dirty
linen in public', but seeking an objective view about issues and dealing with
them appropriately. All this has led to a more liberal and open minded attitude
towards counselling and family therapy as a productive helping process.
However, all of this will fade into oblivion unless there is clarity and adequate
understanding and awareness of the various theories related to a family. These
theories help a family therapist obtain a more clear perspective in viewing familial
problems in light of the theories and accordingly devising an intervention -
programme.
In this Unit, we will discuss the theories, which are in, practice to intervene
families that is, theories which explain and predict behaviour or problems as
well as provide guidance for intervention. These are different from the other
theories we use because, they are more professional rather than being academic.
However, they are just as important for our research and consultancy work
as the other theories we use.
Objectives
After studying this Unit, you will be able to:
• Demonstrate theoretical aspect of crisis theory;
• Understand the application of empowerment theory;
• Discuss the intergenerational theory; and
• Study the intervention provided by practice theories.
4.2 CRISIS THEORY
'Akanksha's marriage was arranged by her parents. She started feeling
suffocated just after few months in her marriage. She is so attached to
her parents and the values of her previous family (family of origin) that
it is becoming very difficult for her to cope with the different expectations
of her in-laws and husband. She is completely disappointed with this role
transition and feels that her world is coming to an end.'
4.2.1 Introduction
Such examples are a regular feature in day-to-day life. Certain life events such
as role transition and deaths or separation of significant others, create hazards
for meeting basic needs and therefore increase the probability of interpersonal
disturbances (Selig, 1976). Before we proceed further, let us understand the
meaning of crisis through the different definitions given by scholars.
Crisis is defined as "an acute emotional upset arising from situational,
developmental, or sociocultural sources and resulting in a temporary inability
to cope by means of one's usual problem-solving devices" (Hoff, 1995, p.4).
An acute disruption of psychological homeostasis is one in which one's usual
coping mechanisms fail and there exists evidence of distress and functional
impairment. The subjective reaction to a stressful life experience is that it
compromises with the individuals' stability and ability to cope or function. The
main cause of a crisis is an intensely stressful, traumatic, or hazardous event,
but two other conditions are also necessary: (1) the individual's perception of
the event as the cause of considerable upset and/or disruption; and (2) the
individual's inability to resolve the disruption by previously used coping
mechanisms (Roberts, 2000, p.513). So according to Roberts, crisis can be
defined as a period of psychological disequilibrium, experienced as a result of
a hazardous event or situation that constitutes significant problems that can not
be countered by using familiar coping strategies.
The origins of crisis theory are grounded in works cited in psychological and
medical journals dating back to the 1920s (Hendricks & Thomas, 2002).
According to Hendricks and Thomas, early research, conducted without the
benefit of the umbrella term "crisis intervention," focused on diverse and
seemingly unrelated areas, such as "mental conflict," "hysteria," "time-limited
mental health care," "short-term psychotherapy," and "acute grief." These early
studies laid the foundation and provided support for many important crisis
intervention concepts, including objective mediation, prioritising patient treatment
over problem diagnosis, directly addressing an individual's crisis and the use
of advanced empathy.
It is generally recognised that the origin of modem crisis intervention, theory
and practice began with the ground breaking efforts of Eric Lindeman (1944).
He reported symptoms of grief and mass disaster from survivors of the disastrous
Coconut Grove nightclub fire of 1942, in which over 490 persons died. He
focused on short term intervention and therapy followed by Caplan (1964), who
first formulated the significance of life crisis. A crisis, according to Caplan, arises
out of some change in a person's life space that produces a modification of
her or his relationship with others and/or her or his perceptions of herself or
himself. He introduced two types of crisis:
1. Developmental crisis, and
2. Situational crisis.
4.2.2 Concepts of Crisis Theory
Some of the basic concepts of crisis theory are given below:
1. Homeostasis: It is the ability of an open system, especially living organisms
within the system, to regulate its internal environment.
2. Interdependence: It is a dynamic process of being mutually responsible
to and sharing a common set of principles with others. This concept differs
distinctly from "dependence" in which an interdependent relationship implies
that all participantsare emotionally,economically,and morally "interdependent".
/
Family Theories in Practice
89
I
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
90
3. Coping mechanisms: It is defined as the skills used to reduce stress.
4. Crisis intervention: It involves the immediate provision of assistance to
individuals experiencing a crisis.
5. Crisis resolution: It is the restoration of equilibrium, cognitive mastery
of the situation, and the development of new coping strategies.
6. Disequilibrium: It is the disruption of an individual's homeostatic balance
because of a crisis event.
4.2.3 Types of Crisis
Following are the three types of crisis:
1.' Developmental crisis: These are the transitions between the stages of
life that we all go through. These major times of transition are often marked
by "Rites of passage" at clearly defined moments. For example, being born,
becoming adults, getting married, becoming an elder, or dying. They are
crisis because they can be periods of severe and prolonged stress.
2. Situational crisis: Sometimes called "accidental crisis", these are more
culture and situation specific. These includes loss of job, income or home,
accident or burglary, or loss through separation or divorce.
3. Complex crisis: These are not part of our everyday experience or shared
accumulated knowledge, so we fmd them harder to cope with. They include
the following:
• Severe trauma, such as violent personal assault, natural or man-made
disasters, often directly involving and affecting both individuals and their
immediate and extended support network, observers and helpers.
• Crisis associated with severe mental illness, which can increase both
the number of crisis a person experiences and sensitivity to a crisis.
4.2.4 Stages of Crisis
The stages mentioned below do not follow a linear process; individuals can
skip stages, can get stuck in a stage, or can move back and forth through
successive stages.
Outcry: This stage includes the initial reactions after the crisis events, which
are reflexive, emotional and behavioural in nature. These reactions can vary
greatly and include panic, fainting, screaming, shock, anger defensiveness,
moaning, flat effect, hysteria, crying and hypertension depending on the situation
and the individual.
Denial and intrusiveness: Outcry can lead to denial, which is blocking of
the impacts of the crisis through emotional numbing, dissociation, cognitive
distortion or minimising. Outcry can also lead to intrusiveness, which includes
involuntary flooding of thoughts and feelings about the crisis, event or trauma,
such as flashback, nightmares, automatic thoughts and preoccupation with what
has happened.
Working through: This stage is the recovery or healing process in which the
thoughts, feelings and images are expressed, acknowledged, explored and
reprocessed through adaptive, healthy coping skills and strategies.
I
/
Completion or resolution: This [mal stage may take months or a year to achieve
and some individuals may never complete the process. The individual's recovery
leads to integration of the crisis event, reorganisation of her or his life, and
adaptation and resolution of trauma towards positive growth, and change or
service to others in crisis.
4.2.5 Intervention
Intervention can be best understood when we understand the stages of crisis.
There have been many researches about how crisis intervention has helped
families to deal with their problems and accomplish goals. The Crisis
Intervention Model was proposed by Roberts. It includes:
Stage I: Psychosocial and lethality assessment: The crisis worker must
conduct a swift but thorough bio-psychosocial assessment. Assessing the lethality,
the crisis worker should inquire about the client's potential for self-harm.
Stage 11:Rapidly establish rapport: Rapport is facilitated by the presence
of counsellor-offered conditiol!s such as genuineness, respect and acceptance
of the client.
Stage Ill: Identify the major problems or crisis precipitants: It focuses
on the client's current problems, which are often the ones that precipitated the
crisis.
Stage IV: Deal with feelings and emotions: The crisis worker strives to allow
the client to express feelings, to vent and heal, and to explain her or his story
about the current crisis situation.
Stage V: Generate and explore alternatives: Alternatives are better when
they are generated collaboratively and when the alternatives selected are "owned"
by the client.
Stage VI: Implement an action plan: The concrete action plans taken at
this stage are critical for restoring the client's equilibrium and psychological
balance.
Stage VII: Follow-up: Crisis workers should plan for a follow-up contact with
the client after the initial intervention to ensure that the crisis is on its way to
being resolved and to evaluate the post-crisis status of the client.
•
Check Your Progress Exercise 1
Note: a) Read the following question carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answer with that provided at the end of this Unit.
1) Write 2-3 lines on the following:
1. Outcry
Family Theories in Practice
91
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
92
2. Developmental crisis
3. Crisis intervention
4.3 EMPOWERMENT THEORY
'Suman is in her late thirties and currently working for a private school.
However, because of decisions made by the trustees, the school is closed.
Her network of friends has been disbanded and people were shuttled off
to jobs and groups elsewhere in the community. She also took up a new
job but was not satisfied with the same. Even activities she previously
enjoyed earlier became a struggle due to her obsession with the previous
job. But thanlifully, a friend of Suman from same school helped her
overcome this frustration gradually'.
4.3.1 Introduction
As we saw in above example, facilitating the process and context for
empowerment requires skills, timing and enabling support. Problems arise as
a result of the family's failure to adequately and equally meet the needs of all
its members.
The roots of empowerment theory come from the educational theory of Paulo
Freire (1970). Feminist theorists and multicultural thinkers were the first to discuss
issues of empowerment with the field of counselling (Lee, 1991; Lyddon, 1998).
Empowerment is a construct shared by many disciplines and the arenas of
community development, psychology, education, economics, and studies of social
movements and organisations, among others. It is clear that empowerment is
a common term that refers to more than one kind of phenomenon.
Empowerment is the process of increasing personal, interpersonal, or political
power so that individuals, families, and communities can take action to improve
their situations (Gutierrez, 1995). According to Vanderslice (1984), family
empowerment is a process through which individuals increase their ability to
influence those people and organisations that affect their lives, as well as the
lives of their children and others they care about.
4.3.2 Concepts of Empowerment Theory
Following are the key concepts of empowerment theory:
1. Critical awareness: It refers to one's knowledge of how to acquire
resources and the skills to manage the resources once they are obtained.
/
2. Empowerment values: It provides a belief system that governs how
professional and clients work together; it include values like attention
towards health, adaptation, competence and natural helping systems
(Zimmerman, 1995).
3. Empowerment process: It is the mechanism through which people,
organisations and communities gain mastery and control over issues that
concern them, develop a critical awareness of their environment and
participate in the decisions that affect their lives (Zimmerman, 1995).
4. Empowerment outcomes: These are the consequences of the empowering
process: if someone is empowered then it refers to outcomes (Zimmerman,
1995).
5. Positive identity: Carr . (2003) stated that oppressed groups must
"discover" their identities. The oppressed people seek to develop an
empowering identity that gives validity to their existence and inspires work
to improve their socio political circumstances.
6. Social actions: Social actions entail that oppressed people work to liberate
themselves and their community (Hanna et aI., 2000). It is crucial that the
oppressed individual be encouraged to participate in community groups.
4.3.3 Levels of Empowerment
Empowerment consists of three levels (Schulz et aI., 1995):
1. Individual: The constructs integrate perceptions of personal control,
participation with others to achieve goals and critical awareness of the
factors that hinder or enhance one's efforts to exert control in one's life.
It reflects the parents' ability to manage day to day situations. This may
change in meaning from one population and context to another. It includes
three components (Zimmerman, 1995):
i) Intrapersonal: It refers to how people think about themselves and
includes domain-specific and perceived control and self-efficacy,
motivation to control and perception of competence.
ii) Interactional: It refers to how people think about and relate to their
social environment or the transactions between people and environment.
,
ill) Behavioural: It refers to the specific actions the individual takes to
exercise influence on the environment through participationin community
organisations and activities.
These three components can be used to identify the specific elements appropriate
for particular constituencies and contexts.
For example, individuals who believe that they have control over their lives
(intrapersonal), but do not know how to go about eliminating physical barriers
(interactional), and do not make any effort to remove those barriers (behavioural)
are less empowered than those who learn the mechanism.
2. Organisational: It includes processes and structures that enhance member
participation and improve organisational effectiveness for goal achievement.
It reflects the degree to which the parentis able to work with the service
system. ,
-~ -
/Family Theories in Practice
93

Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
94
3. Community: It refers to collective action to improve the quality of life
in a community and the connections among the community, organisations
and agencies. It reflects the parent's advocacy for improved services for
children.
4.3.4 Expressions of Empowerment
The expressions of empowerment include the following:
• Attitude : Reflecting the parents' belief and mirroring the interpersonal
component of empowerment.
• Knowledge: Reflecting parents' understanding of their environment and
mirroring the interactional component of the enpowerment.
• Behaviours: What a parent actually does, reflecting the behaviorial
component of the empowerment.
4.3.5 Characteristics of Empowered Families
Following are the characteristics of empowered families:
• The ability to access and control the needed resources,
• The ability to take decisions and solve problems,
• The ability to interact effectively with others in the social exchange process
(Dumst, Trivette & Deel, 1988), and
• The ability to provide the skills that promote self sufficiency.
4.3.6 Intervention
According to David Fatterman (1996), empowerment evaluation happens in the
following way:
Capacity building: Teaching people to conduct their own evaluation and thus
helping them become more self sufficient.
Facilitation: Evaluators can act as facilitators to help others conduct evaluation.
Advocacy: They allow participants to shape the direction of the evaluation .
•
Illumination: It illuminates the several levels of empowerment.
Liberation: Helping individuals to take charge of their lives that liberates them
from traditional expectations and roles and redefines their identities and future
roles.
____ refers to how people think about and relate to their
social environment; that is transactions between people and
environment.
Check Your Progress Exercise 2
Note: a) Read the following question carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answer with that provided at the end of this unit.
1. Fill in the blanks:
i)
/
ii) refers to one's knowledge of how to acquire those
resources and the skill to manage the resources once they are
obtained.
iii) ___ and are the expressions
of empowerment.
4.4 INTERGENERATIONAL THEORY
'vivek and Ashima seem to be' an ideal couple. Both are smart, attractive,
well educated and passionate in whatever they do. But still their marital
life is coming to end due to dependent and dominant nature of Vivek.
Ashima wanted sharingof power in the family but things didn't work and
they approached a counsellor to save their relationship.'
4.4.1 Introduction
This theory is also known as Bowen's Systematic Family Theory (1978).
Murray Bowen's Intergenerational Model focuses on how experiences in the
family of origin affect individual and family functioning in subsequent generations,
that is, this theory focuses on intra-familial and multi-generational relationships
within families. A primary concept in family systems theory is that the family
includes interconnected members and each member influences others in predictable
and recurring ways.
According to intergenerational theory, family is considered as a system of
interdependent people; individual behaviour cannot be understood adequately
without including the relationship system in which that individual lives; and
changes in degrees of anxiety greatly affect the condition of that system. So,
before learning about concepts lets understand some basic terms related to these
concepts.
1. Differentiation: It is the central concept to this theory. It includes individual
and family differentiation. Individual differentiation refers to the ability of
family members to express their own individuality and act autonomously
while remaining emotionally connected to others. Family differentiation
refers to the degree to which difference and individuality is tolerated within
the family system.
2. Individuation or fusion: Both the concepts lie on the opposite ends of
bipolar continuum. Individuation is characterised by an individual's ability
to be autonomous in relationship and not emotionally controlled by others.
It is characterised by over involvement with significant others in decision
making and difficulty formulating opinions or perspectives independent of
one's parents or significant others-in other words, taking in others' beliefs
and values in their entirety, without undertaking a thoughtful examination
to determine their relative fit with one's personal life principles (Bowen,
1978; Kerr, 1984).
3. Intimacy or isolation: It is also a bipolar concept wherein intimacy lies
on one end of continuum with isolation on the other. Intimacy reflects an
/
Family Theories in Practice
95
I
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
96
4.
individual's voluntary choice to be close with another person while
maintaining distinct personal boundaries.
Triangulation: This is not bipolar concept. It is viewed as a process of
handling fusion and tension in a dyad by engaging a third person into the
relationship.
Emotional cutoff: It is separation by emotional or physical distance from
the family of origin. People who cut off from their original families are more
likely to repeat the same patterns in their own relationships.
Family projection process: Parental problems are transferred from
generation to generation. This projection results in one or more of the
children in the family having a lower level of differentiation than the parents
have. The more fused is the family the more likely it is that more than
one child will be an object of projection. This projection process may begin
as early as the time of mother-infant bonding. In nutshell, we can say that
it involves the parent "projecting" her or his unresolved emotional
attachments or conflicts onto the children, which leads to recurrent patterns
of behaviour in subsequent generations.
Nuclear family emotional processes: It refers to the emotional patterns
that exist in a family over the years that are passed on to each generation.
Reactions to this family emotional process include; reactive emotional
distance, physical or emotional dysfunction in one spouse, overt conflict,
projection of problems onto one or more children.
Multi-generational process: It is anchored in the emotional system and
includes emotions, feelings, subjectively determined attitudes, values, and
beliefs that are transmitted from one generation to next (Kerr & Bowen,
1988, p.224).
5.
6.
7.
8.
9. Societal emotional process: These are the social expectations about
races, classes, ethnic groups, gender, sexual orientation and their effect on
the family.
10. Sibling position: It is important as each child has a certain position in
the family, and it is less or more likely to fit some projection of the family
as well as interaction with siblings.
4.4.2 Concepts of Intergenerational Theory
The Bowen theory consists of eight formal concepts and a central variable
(Bowen,1978). One concept; the differentiation of self, forms the core of the
theory and remaining seven concepts describe different aspects of family
functioning. Concepts of intergenerational theory are characterised as follows:
1. Differentiation of self: Differentiation of self refers to the extent to which
an individual has successfully resolved emotional attachments to her or his
family of origin. Individuals who are highly differentiated (that is have a
clear sense of self) tend to function better in relationships because they
are capable of separating their emotions from their rational, logical thoughts.
They are able to make decisions and behave objectively, instead of relying
solely on their emotions to drive their behaviour. They are likely to perceive
their lives as being under their control. Each family is the product of many
families in the generation that precedes it.
2. Spousal fusion or individuation: This is the degree to which a person
operates in a fused or an individuated manner in relation to the spouse
or the significant others.
3. Intergenerational fusion or individuation: This is the degree to which
a person operates in a fused or an individuated manner with parents.
4. Spousal intimacy: It refers to a person's reported satisfaction or
dissatisfaction and degree of intimacy with the spouse. Intimacy is used
here as the degree of voluntary closeness with distinct boundaries. Intimacy
increases as differentiation does.
5. Intergenerational intimacy: This involve person's reported satisfaction or
dissatisfaction and degree' of intimacy with his or her parents.
6. Nuclear family triangulation: Triangulation between spouses and their
children. Triangulation decreases as differentiation increases.
7. Intergenerational triangulation: This refers to triangulation between
spouses and their children.
8. Intergenerational intimidation or personal authority: This is seen as
a bipolar concept in that intergenerational intimidation lies on one end of
the continuum with personal authority on the other. In intergenerational
intimidation adult is dependent upon her or his parents as the primary
component of her or his self-conception. This prevents individual from
becoming autonomous. Intergenerational intimidation decreases as
differentiation decreases. Personal authority on the other end as described
by Williamson (1991) refers to the ability to take responsibility for one's
thoughts, actions and feelings while being intimately related to the significant
others. It is, in effect, differentiation in intimate relationships.
4.4.3 Intervention
Prerequisites for intervention are knowledge of family systems and strong
motivation. These include the following:
1. Placing the presenting problem in a multigenerational frame,
2. Lowering anxiety,
3. Increasing differentiation especially of the marital couples (increasing
the parents' ability to control their own anxiety and fortifying parental
emotional functioning) by the therapist triangulating with them but
staying neutral,
4. Forming relationships with the dysfunctional member,
5. Opening closed ties and detriangulation of members,
6. Symptom focus is avoided,
7. Evaluating progress,
8. Feminists add addressing the power differential in the couple, and
9. Genograms: A genogram will not only show the names of people who
belong to a family lineage, but how these people interact with each
other. Diagram of family's multigenerational relationship system, noting
data such as sex, age, year of marriage, offspring, current marital status,
and year of death are often helpfuL
Family Theories in Practice
97

Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
98
Check Your Progress Exercise 3
Note: a) Read the following question carefully and answer in the space
provided below.
b) Check your answer with that provided at the end of this Unit.
1. Match the columns:
1. Personal authority (a) Degree to which a person
bahaves in an individuated
manner in relation to the
spouse.
2. Nuclear family triangulation (b) Degree to which a person
operates in fused or an
individuated manner with
parents.
3. Spousal Fusion (c) Bowen
4. Intergenerational Fusion (d) Williamson
4.5 LET US SUM UP
This Unit highlights the three family theories which are gaining importance in
day-by-day in helping families in stressful conditions. These are:
• Crisis theory which entails how certain life events create hazards for meeting
basic needs and lead to the crisis situation. It also covers the types and
intervention stages for crisis.
• Empowerment theory discusses how to increase power at different levels
as to reach an acceptable situation. It deals with the three different levels
of empowerment and the concepts related to it and also the empowerment
process for intervention.
• Intergenerational theory, which mainly revolves around the differentiation
process, helps the family to deal with stressful conditions by knowing ~multigenerational process.
4.6 GLOSSARY
Domain specific perceived control :It refers to personal, interpersonal' or
socio-political control.
Multigenerational transmission
process
:It is the process by which family
emotional processes are transferred
and maintained over generations.
\ .-
/
Pair work : When a practitioner works with two
children or two youths, each with a
different level of social perspective
taking.
Rules : These are sets of standards, laws
or traditions that tell us how to live
in relation to each other.
Self-efficacy : It refers to perceptions about one's
ability to achieve desired outcomes.
Stress : It is the consequence of the failure
to adapt to change.
4.7 ANSWERS TO CHECK YOUR PROGRESS
EXERCISES
Check Your Progress Exercise 1
1. Outcry: This is the stage of crisis which involves immediate reaction after
crisis situation. For example, Manasi fainted as she heard the news of her
father's demise.
2. Developmental crisis: This is the crisis faced when the individual steps from
one developmental stage to another. For example, from early childhood
to adolescence.
3. Crisis intervention: It refers to the methods used to offer immediate and
short-term help to individuals who experience an event that produces
emotional, mental, physical, and behavioural distress or problems. For
example, after death of Manasvi's husband, she tried to commit suicide
forgetting about her three year old daughter. After counselling with therapist
she realised her importance of surviving for her daughter.
Check Your Progress Exercise 2
i) Interactionallevel
ii) Critical awareness
iii) Attitude, knowledge, behaviour
Check Your Progress Exercise 3
1. - d), 2. - c), 3. - a), 4. - b)
4.8 UNIT END QUESTIONS
1. Describe the applications of crisis theory in day-to-day life.
2. Explain some examples which demonstrate the use of empowerment
theory.
3. How is intergenerational theory different from other theories?
/
Family Theories in Practice
99
I
Introduction to Counselling
and Family Therapy
100
4.9 FURTHER READINGS AND REFERENCES
Andrew, L. & Selig, A. L. (1976). Crisis theory and family growth. The family
coordinator, 25, 3, 291-295.
Bowen, M. (1978). Family therapy in clinical practice. New York: Jason
Aronson.
Caplan, G. (1964). Principles of preventive psychiatry. New York: Basic
Books.
Carr, E.S. (2003). Rethinking empowerment theory using feminist lens: The
importance of process. Affilia, 18, 8-20.
Doherty, W., Boss, P., LaRossa, R., Schumm, W., & Steinmetz, S. (1993).
Family theories and methods:A contextual approach. In P. Boss, W. Doherty
R. LaRossa, W. Schumm, & S. Steinmetz (Eds), Sourcebook offamily theories
and methods: A contextual approach (pp. 3-30). New York: Plenum.
Durnst, C.l, Trivette, C.M., & Deal, A. (1988). Enabling and empowering
Families: Principle and Guidelines for practice. Cambridge, MA: Brookline
Books.
Fetterman, D. (1996). Empowerment evaluation: An Introduction to theory
and practice. U.S.A.: Sage Publications.
Freire, P. (1970). Pedagogy of the oppressed. New York: Continuum
International Publishing.
Gutierrez, L. M. (1995). Understanding the empowerment process: Does
consciousness make a difference? Social Work Research, 19, 229-237.
Hanna, F. r., Talley, W. B., & Guindon, M. H. (2000). The power of perception:
Toward a model of cultural oppression and liberation. Journal of Counseling
& Development, 78, 430-44l.
Hendricks, J. E. & Thomas, M. W. (2002). Historical and theoretical overview.
In J. E. Hendricks & B. D. Byers(Eds.), Crisis intervention in criminal justice/
social service (3rd ed.) (pp. 3-3U Springfield, IL: Charles C. Thomas.
Hoff, L. A. (Eds) (1995). People in crisis. San Francisco, CA: Jossey-Bass
Publishers.
Kerr, M. E. (1984). Theoretical base for differentiation of self in one's family
of origin. Clinical Supervisor, 2, 3-36.
Klein, D. M. (1994). Theory as data: An investigation of ourselves. Paper
presented at National Council of Family Relations, Theory Construction and
Research Methodology Workshop, Minneapolis, MN.
Koren, P. E., DeChiUo, N., & Friesen, B. l (1992). Measuring empowerment
in families whose children have emotional disabilities. A brief questionnaire.
Rehabilitation Psychology, 37, 305-32l.
Lee, c.c. (1991). Empowerment in counseling. Journal of counseling &
development, 69, 229-230.
Lindemann, E. (1944). Symptomatology and management of acute grief.
/
MCFT-003
COUNSELLING AND FAMILY THERAPY: BASIC CONCEPTS
AND THEORETICAL PERSPECTIVES
BLOCKl INTRODUCTION TO COUNS'£LLINGAND FAMILY THERAPY
Unit 1
Unit 2
Unit 3
Unit4
Counselling: Meaning, Scope and Applications
Family Therapy: Meaning, Scope and Applications
Career Counselling
Family Theories in Practice
BLOCK 2 SCHOOLS OF COUNSELLING
Unit 5
Unit 6
Unit 7
Unit 8
Psychodynamic Approaches
Cognitive-Behavioural Approaches
Person-Centred Approaches
Group Counselling and other Counselling Approaches
BLOCK:3 SCHOOLS {)F E<\MfLYTHERAPY
Unit 9
Unit 10
~ 'nit 1 j
System le Farn ilylh;r4'>
Solution Focu-ed and SU",llcgi,: Famit, Therapy
Structural r Gmily'!"hcmr:
Unt! 12 Cognitive Behavioural Fami IyTherapy
Unil 13
BLOCK 4 MODALITlES OF COUNSELLING AND FAMILY THERAPY
Unit 14
Unit 15
Unit 16
Unit 17
Unit 18
Family Interviewing
Crisis Intervention
Supportive Counselling
Psychoeducation
Social Skills Therapy
MANUAL FOR SUPERVISED PRACTICUM (MCFTL-003)
/
MPOO-IGNOUlP.O.2T IMarch.2011
ISBN - 978-81-266-5212-9
/
